1/2 out of 5 – Drinking, Drugs, and/or Smoking – Partying is somewhat the main plot of the book, but there’s no alcohol or other drug use to go around.
And last but not least is my husband’s sides. He’s having Amy’s brand frozen vegetable lasagna for the entree. To go with is is a mixed green salad with red onion slices, green and yellow plum tomatoes from the local market, sweet clover sprouts and mediterranean flavored vegan (soy) feta cheese on top. At top left is a cup of lentil & quinoa tabbouleh and at the bottom left are purple rice crackers for the tabbouleh and 2 dried apricots packed in his Easy Lunch Box.
Hope this helps.
and two of these to keep me sane
Finally, there are definite historical reasons why people dislike Catholicism.
Learning to fly 3'47
With my favorite cruciferous vegetable still in season, I’ll be making this tasty recipe, that is chock-full of antioxidant nutrients, a few more times. The mixture is great with pasta, like Barilla’s Multigrain Angel Hair, and also delicious as a crostini topped with Parmigiano-Reggiano. If your kids already eat pesto, they will probably eat this healthier version. The recipe uses Lacinato and White Peacock Kale but Dino (remove leaves from stem) is good as well. Enjoy!
Sheila Nayar, Greensboro College. Primary Issues with Secondary Orality Iryna Dovganyuk, University of Alberta. Television as Art in the Digital Age
And see Piggy poking Tazzy at the end of the clip with his magic pencil? Poor Tazzy always had to duck and cover to escape Piggy’s pokes and prods (that was not meant to sound as rude as it does).
And yes, the ivy is exceptionally luscious.
If you are looking for a place to party, Colombia is the place to go. We have carnivals, salsa parties, underground nightclubs… But I must warn you, whether you like it or not, bring your dancing shoes because everyone dances in Colombia, and you will to. Dancing to Colombians is like soccer to Brasilians. If you love nature, you are in for a mega treat, you must go trekking through the different natural parks. La Ciudad Perdida or Tayrona National Park just to name a few are amazing. We have lots of birds and a huge biodiversity. You will be able to see colourful parrots, monkeys, tapirs, blue butterflies, turquoise lizards, pink dolphins depending on where you go.
Finally, two days ago, I called a halt. I asked them very firmly to stop the new painkiller, to stop the toxic feeds, to stop the new vitamins and re-introduce my old painkillers. I made them pull the tube out of my nose just to be sure.
The outsider test is simply a challenge to test one’s own religious faith with the presumption of skepticism, as an outsider. It calls upon believers to “Test or examine your religious beliefs as if you were outsiders with the same presumption of skepticism you use to test or examine other religious beliefs.” Its presumption is that when examining any set of religious beliefs skepticism is warranted, since the odds are good that the particular set of religious beliefs you have adopted is wrong.
It’s supposed to be another lovely day – in the 70’s again. Tomorrow we start the downward trend and we’ll be back in the 50’s by the weekend with cold nights. Crisp chill in the air, warm fire burning in the workshop stove, leaves crunching under your feet…nice time of year!
Example One: The mobile armory app does not require an authenticator.
d) could we get away without any Germans in the show – but I didn’t want any comedy villains
Fluffy Sheep Quilting has lots of little things that make life shopping online easier. In the top right hand corner you can click on your choice of currencies - Euros, Sterling, or US dollars. You can search for fabric in a myriad of ways - colour, type, collection, manufacturer, etc. She has a wishlist set up so that you can play at shopping but not forget what you really wanted for when the money is available.
Have we lived only a little, have wegrown old just a little...
44. It is not possible to tickle yourself. Even the most ticklish among us do not have the ability to tickle ourselves.
I guess I don’t make sense either.
Sloan’s replacement, Mel Thompson, had one good year, and then the program went downhill, including a 3-20 debacle in 1963. Thompson did manage to put together two consecutive winning campaigns after that season (with records of 11-10 and 13-11). However, Thompson and the program then suffered two more losing years with a combined win-loss total of 15-33. His final season eventually spawned a best-selling book in which the coach was portrayed as something less than human, or all too human, depending on your point of view.
Every business has to be obsessed with interactive communications. As a content-developer, I see opportunities almost daily for writers, editors, social media managers, cross-media developers, etc. Every business needs these functions whereas twenty years ago, all this was handled by a business card handed out at the right business events. Some companies had newsletters. Now, having a website, blog, FaceBook page, LinkedIn page, Twitter, online features, presentations, and events, are expected. Cross-platform messages are modular; consistency sought.
After breakfast this morning we packed up lunch and headed straight to the coast. The problem with where we live is that we have two counties of wonderful coastline to choose from. We opted for Southwold in the end.
Next month, I'll once again be going completely outside of my personal creative box for some artistic cross-training of the literary variety. And I invite any of you who are at all interested in trying your hand at writing a novel to join me!
"I should check if he's ok."
Will always find their kind;
While writing teenaged angst words also filled with mirth.
But this new one — it’s awesome. They have a cover of Hedwig & The Angry Inch’s song “Angry Inch”. Sooooooooo much better than the original, which is too-straight-rock not-enough-metal for me. I particularly like “(We Were) Electrocute” as well. Also good is “If You Don’t Kill Me, I’m Going To Have To Kill You (Gimme That)”, and of course the title track “Life Is Killing Me”. The opening song “I Don’t Wanna Be Me” is also quite good and I’m sure is very self-serving to the goths and emo kids who might be listening to it.
people they know.
I'm extremely proud of all of them!!
LJ, sent us a kit themed for a masculine card. I heard a few virtual gasps out there. Why is it that we view masculine cards as such a challenge?! The recipients are probably our least critical! Example, DH looks at a card created with a Magnolia image. Instead of the overall card comment, he asks why she has no mouth. I have no answer....so what do ya think of the card?
In a bowl, mix together:
When Brian Sewell was asked if he was going to see the Gustav Klimt exhibition at Tate Liverpool, he replied: “But that would mean going to Liverpool. Liverpool’s awful. Nothing would get me there. They should dig a trench all round the place and pull it out to sea.”
In other words, it's ridiculously sweet. If you want bourbon, with a hint of fruit, like I was hoping for, then you'll be out of luck. It can be salvaged by using it as a mixer with real liquor. Hold the duck.
‘Hello’ said the taller guy (English), ‘we came last year, do you remember?’
It is, frankly, far far too simple.
“Here Comes The Sun” by Joshua M. Greene
I could cry an ocean of tears, and I have
Electric Eel:
I took the morning off from running, partly from imbibing too much, but also from being generally run-down, overextended and tired. I decided I was on the edge of getting the flu or something, so I had a "sleep-in and be a total slacker" day. I feel much better today.
Good morning blog friends! It's May! Yay!! One of my favorite months. And it' also the last day that my son will be a twelve year old. EEEak! I can't believe he is entering "teenworld" tomorrow! We are blessed with such and amazing young man and I am so proud of him!
Or does it? In my estimation, at the end of the day Exit is yet another footnote to Warhol and Warhol is ultimately part of the problem and not part of the solution; i.e., he's a prophet for profit by way of the reduction of art to advertising. Exit certainly tweaks the art establishment for colonizing street art for yet another sector of the big bucks art market. But as the full title ironically confesses, the buck stops there and so does the critique. Banksy hides solitary in the shadows in order to laugh all the way to the bank, see?
My grandma would have been 100 tomorrow. She used to leave her shoes upturned at night for her husband to notice the holes in the soles before she could get a new pair. Children not that many decades ago walked miles to school without shoes. People used to be hung for stealing a loaf of bread to feed their starving families. People were deported for similar minor crimes.
Liberty is only a heartbeat away from the authority and power that seeks to shackle us. Let us be ever vigilant and steadfast. Believe not those who would convince you that government, and the power it wields is benign.
Some of the most devastating words in the English language strung together are “I never told him how much I loved him.”
These alone may be a reason to marry into a Portuguese family. When I was first offered these “fishcakes” during a traditional Christmas Eve dinner, I had unpleasant visions of breaded and fried fish mush. Fortunately these are nothing the like. Now that I have the knack for them, I usually make them in large quantities (quintuple the recipe) and freeze the raw dough in sandwich bags for later use. My mother-in-law has one of those handy food saver systems where she actually makes the individual codfish cakes, freezes them on a cookie sheet, and then stores them in vacuum packed bags where they keep their unique shape perfectly.
So drop me a line, how do you find yourself cornered with literary license versus validity or are you so far gone with verbomania you can bluff your way through it?
I’m saving the worst for last, William. I get he was a villain, I have no problem with him being a villain, and doing his villainy things. My problem was that there was no counter balance to him, there wasn’t an opposite hero character that was just as good to his bad. The author really focused and was descriptive of his scenes but didn’t give us an equally tender moment. After the 3rd “active” scene of his, I started to wonder why the author was so focused on that, We got it, we know what William likes and what gets him going. But just in case you didn’t get it the first time, there are about 5 “active” scenes.
Hopefully it won't be another two weeks before I post again this time :)
But can the Changers be trusted this time?
The long eucalyptus trees
Days later, Kate opened the door and met his determined stare. He wanted to be sure, beyond any doubt, that she knew. Standing silently, he reached out and took her hand in his, entwined their fingers and clasped their hands together tightly. She held his breath in hers and their eyes found the souls. Then, dropping his stare to the ground, he let go. Melancholy washed over her as she watched him walk away. ‘Elliott….wait’ she screamed in her head. He never looked back.
HOW TO: All the eye shadows I used are listed in the photo and accidentally I used only MAC eye shadows. How I did it, I put All that glitters all over my eyelid top and bottom, all the way to the brows on top, they lined my eyes with MUFE eye pencil, thick heavy lines. Then I just worked the eye shadows, from darkest to lightest, using Carbon first, to go over the eyeliner and spread it out and soften it, then I added Tempting and blended it, then on top of that moving upward to my brows I used all the other shadows from darker to lightest. I used Phloof! and highlight, under brows and inner eye corner. Bottom lid was just eyeliner and Carbon eye shadow, but then I decided to add more spunk to it and applied MAC My dark magic eye shadow (both colors) on top of the black, to add purple sparkle. Finally I added fake lashes, Diamond Lash Gorgeous on top and Princess on bottom. I found out that the best way to glue on princess bottom lashes is to cut them up into 3 pieces, and glue them all separately. It makes positioning them sooooo much easier! I also wore Princess Mimi Apple Green circle lens, to really make my eyes look big and dramatic! :D
Prepare a mold in which to set the agar-agar. Anything non-stick will work, just sprinkle it with a little water to help the agar-agar release later. I used silicon cupcake cups. Also have handy the food coloring and bowls for mixing the coloured portions. It helps to put the bowls in the fridge to cool them down first.
I would have never known because our girly girl doesn't wear sneakers!
Grind all the spices together and keep aside. Sieve together flour, salt, baking powder and baking soda. In a bowl, beat eggs with a electric beater, add vanilla essence and pineapple essence. When it turns smooth add sugar, beat well. Pour oil and mix. Add the flour and spice powders, pour orange juice. Beat with a wooden stick (do not over beat and always beat to one direction only) till the batter turns to a ribbon consistency.
* First Round - inserted 1:10
-So tell us a little about your work that will be published from Dengeki Bunko.
Every time I bake I have to borrow my grandmother's Kitchenaid mixer, because not only do I not have a stand mixer, I don't even have a hand mixer. So fast forward to Thursday. While perusing QVC.com and checking out the Kitchenaids they were all of a sudden on Easy Pay. Which means 5 easy installments to your credit card so you don't realize that you just spent over 300 dollars on a kitchen appliance and think you got a bargain, or in my case, you are poor and can't upfront 300 dollars right at once.
Mallory Holtman viewed Sara Tucholsky as her opponent . . . until she was overcome by compassion for her need.
My mom had lovely eyes. They were light colored, kind of greenish blue, and one of her best features. When I was growing up, people would sometimes remark that I had her eyes. Mine are more truly blue than hers were, but a lot of times people would point out how similar they were to hers.
"With bones and cartilage starting to form and vital organs beginning to function, baby is making major progress. Body length will almost double in the next three weeks, and arm joints are now working. (Soon, legs will too.) " - thebump.com
Here’s why: A couple in Sweetwater, Texas, had a lot of potted plants. During a recent cold spell, the wife was bringing a lot of them indoors to protect them from a possible freeze.
As a dinner, make 2-3 large mushrooms per person. I eat 2 and am full, but Steve and his friend were here and both ate 3 each.
I love my life.
This is it, it's for all the marbles. This will NEVER happen again. The winner of this game will have bragging rights for thirty years. And the loser will hang their head in shame.
So I’m back where I started. Studies say whatever studies are paid to say. There was a time in my life when I said what I was paid to say, to earn a living. But I stopped, because internal disingenuity is the root cause of all disease. Saying what you can see is not true makes you sick. Whether there’s a “peer-reviewed” study that proves it or not.
i am surrounding myslef in home decor inspiration.
Any takers?… Anyone?… Anyone?… Bueller?… Bueller?
More information: The Stanford Libraries searchable database includes material from the university's extensive Fuller archive: http://library.stanford.edu
Hello..Hello Everyone!!
"Tell that bully to back off Black Pudding".
Bella Sera in Williamstown was formerly Cafe Capri. It shares its name with a brand of low price wines so I was interested to see if the food there was a cut above the Bella Sera wines. Six of us converged on this almost local eatery last Friday evening. The place looks nice with an almost elegant decor and the menus matching the signage. I thought that was a nice touch. We had a round table which is always better for conversing and making everyone feel like we are dining together.
How has God challenged you in this area? Any tips on how to “stick to the stuff” spiritually? I would love to hear your thoughts in the comment section below.
Kuroneko takes place during wartime and its opening scene illustrates the brutality of the period. The way the samurai swarm the women’s home was like wild animals stalking their prey. Once inside they raid the home of food and than each one takes their turn raping the women. A pretty ugly and stark picture of the inhumanity we humans are capable of. The horrific scene is a strong argument for the women’s revenge. But when you are negotiating with the spirit underworld vengeance can have a high price. Kuroneko is also a love story. Gintoki was a farmer before he was taken by force to join the war. Some years have passed since Yone and Shige seen Gintoki who is now a samurai. I do not want to spoil this haunting tale so I will state only that its story is enthralling.
That explanation was probably way too complicated. Without further ado:
The email was sent at a time when the issue of independence for Scotland is on the political agenda because of a promised referendum by the Scottish First Minister Alex Salmond.
vs
Good morning Gossips, it’s me GG. Spotted: Gem at Sterling McCall Lexus, making BFFs with the cappuccino machine. He had two cups of French vanilla cappuccino and had a croissant, his favorites. Lucky for him he didn’t spill coffee on his cream skinny jeans or leather gladiator sandals.
Stipe: Now, I wrote some bad lyrics when I was 21 and did drugs back then. But I never wrote, "The animals are strange, try to put it in."
They want the next government to focus mainly on fighting poverty and unemployment, do more to redistribute income from the wealthy and embark on a program of nationalizing major industries.
I had my "levels" checked a few months ago and they were "all over the place" and my PCOS was flared. I've gained back 20 pounds because of that. I went to the gyno because my endocrinologist didn't know enough about the birth control pills out there to tell me what to take.
Cheers indeed
By myths of laziness and hazy memes of craziness
“The door’s still open (with the Panthers). We’re still talking,” Rosenhaus said today. “But I think it’s more likely that he would be on another team this year.”
There is confusion about what art is. The qualities that make something art are intrinsic, not external. It is the artifice, the organising of elements, perspective, choice of colour etc, that make it art. The result is obtained by transforming reality and thus nature through human imagination and emotion and is realised by skill and technique.
Second place in the non-Council posts is Ms. Cheesecake, aka Villainous Company. The Baron loves her blog image (I think it’s the shot of those long, long legs). This time she won for “Selected Quotes Do Not A Reasoned Argument Make.” V.C. proves her point by writing such a closely reasoned debate that I can’t find a way to shoehorn in and give you a snippet. Thus, you’ll have to see what she has to say about the arguments re what did or didn’t happen at Haditha and what should happen from here on in.
Zelda Rubenstein went on to a number of Film and TV roles and just passed away in early 2010.
Groan.
My mom and dad were guarding my heart! They were protecting me from having garbage IN so I wouldn't produce garbage! As a mom, I do that same thing for my kiddos. What is on my boys' MP3 players? Praise and Worship music, other songs about Jesus, and math songs (to help them learn math facts). For as long as I can, I will guard my children's hearts. That's my job as their momma. God entrusted these beautiful boys to me and expects me to protect them until they can protect themselves.
Noticed one gentle man listening to music via his iPod while swimming! That iPod has a jacket which could be water resistant up to a few feet in the water. Just in case if he needed to listen to the songs when he was swimming under water. Cool. I believe, a product is extraordinarily successful when more and more companies try to make their products just around that extraordinary product. iPod is one among them?
Najib has a knack for distancing himself from potentially difficult situations. He also keeps his hands clean by abrogating responsibility.
Monday.. Fish sticks and Tater Tots (and maybe frozen veggies) I have a week 5 class tonight with a pot luck so that is for my hubby and our kiddos. I'm not heartless, I am just using what we have..
6.) My favorite food is Taco's.
In celebration of this initiative, Aruba will be hosting their 3rd Annual Ladies of Harley Ride from May 4th to May 6th, consisting of a Garage Party at the dealership on May 4th, 2012 from 7 pm to 9 pm, night ride on May 5th to Moomba Beach with live music by Dushi Band and daytime ride May 6th with DJ entertainment, food, drinks and prizes to announce the new Ladies of Harley Queen of 2012. Last year’s event was very successful, inspiring many women to join the motorcycle world. This year, it promises to be even more successful as Karen Davidson, creative director for Harley-Davidson General Merchandise and Great-Granddaughter of Co-Founder William Davidson, will be in attendance.
Porque (‘why’ in Portuguese).
On the right side of the buckle, I've got a Tactical Tailor grenade pouch that holds a USGI tritium-illuminated compass, a signal mirror, another Bic lighter with Ranger bands, and camouflage face-paint (a brief aside: if you're decked out in head-to-toe camouflage, but don't have camouflage for your face...well, you know what I'm going to say...it starts with a "G" and rhymes with day). I like the GI compass, because so much of my movement is at night. I know a lot of guys, even some high-speed JSOC ninjas, who prefer a sport orienteering compass, and that's cool. I just like the GI model and always have.
Tuesday May 1
Don't need any of those things
Other online 1022
A few things to retain: Sam texted Freddie from jail. But she’s just visiting…
Except two things:
November 19th my buyer (wife) called to see if I'd considered dropping my price by the $20K. I told her no, I'd discuss it with my lawyer and get back to her. The following day, November 20th, a letter was faxed to my lawyer from my buyers' lawyer serving notice that the transaction is now at an end and please return the $25K deposit!!! At this point, my buyers had my boat off the market for 12 weeks so no others were shown the boat as we'd been told their loan had been approved.
For my part, I have added a scene break and introduced a new character into the end of my second chapter – which the tutor would not have seen at all. I’ve included the extract below;
When all is said and done, it is bound to be rather quiet and boring.
Ki and I are having Adventures. This little blog is about Day #6. Monday.
Building Footprint : 25% of land area
"Interactive cutscenes" w/ NPCs Better "interactive cutscenes" w/ NPCs
Red Dog/The Guard (Upperthong Village Hall, from 7pm)
So, walk tall, showing pride to bear Christ’s name and know that anyone who blesses you because of that name is also blessed. It doesn’t diminish your own blessings, but instead increases it. It’s a wonderful cascade of blessings. A thing to be shared. And it’s all because of the love of God.
Here are some of the silly sentances we made:
But as Doug pointed out in his Comment with regard to my last Post in which I took issue with the Telegraph's wild over-estimate for 3 babies sharing the same birth date, the odds change greatly if you don't specify a particular couple and a particular birth date. The odds for a particular couple having 3 babies all born on the same date may be around 133,000 to one, but if you have 133,000 couples each having 3 babies, then you are very likely indeed to have one couple with 3 babies sharing a same birth date. Doug points out in his Comment that you only need 23 people in a room for there to be a more than 50% chance that two of them will share the same birth date. If you have 60 people in a room it is virtually certain that two of them will share the same birth date.
While in London a few weeks ago Kris and I decided to partake in one of our very favorite activities, Afternoon Tea, of course! I was originally planning on booking tea at the Savoy until I heard about this extra special, extra unusual tea on offer at the Sanderson Hotel. They decided to take the sophisticated custom and turn it on its head before pushing it straight down the rabbit hole to Wonderland. This is the Mad Hatters Afternoon Tea!
+ Ability to hold camera bodies.
As you know and as it seems my new addiction, we have been to find caches today, Out of a fair few we found only one, we did look for others with no avail. We will try again another day and maybe other locations.
He sat down in his chair again,
These are rose hips from those very prickly Rosa Rugosas that are so common along the Maine coast. I think I find the rose hips prettier than the flowers.
To fashion scholars, aprons are among the most important cultural markers of woman's lives since they are one of the most basic forms of clothing and evoke woman's roles as caretakers. According to Beth Alberty, curator of the exhibition Apropos Apron at the Metropolitan Museum of Art, the apron "draws symbolic and magic power from the sex to which it both calls attention and provides modesty and protective cover...much of (apron language and love) has to do with sexuality, fertility, and marital relations and testifies to the significance of the apron's position on the body."
Hello everyone - thanks for joining us again for another new charity card making challenge in aid of St Luke's Hospice. This month we want you to fly with us - make any style of card you like but include something that flies – a bird, butterfly, fairy, angel, plane, hot air balloon or even Pegasus! This month, as well as awarding our winners badge to the cards we all think best fit our theme - one of our Design Team, Ciara, has kindly donated a prize which will go to the best online card (do remember to post your cards online as well as sending the physical ones to the charity for sale). The prize is a Ribbon Girl bundle - blue to match our flying theme.
DEUTERONOMY 10:12
Refills the room
2 stalks celery, diced
So, it being late and I’m to tired to begin to write something deep or very “learned” (feel the irony, I’m simply too tired after two hectic days with kids around me), I will take this opportunity to say thank you all. My readers, all the bloggers on WordPress, you guys who have commented on my posts, those of you who ‘like’ my posts, those of you who follow me (that seriously mean a lot), and especially those two of you who found my writings interestingly enough to reblog my posts. Let’s keep up the good work:o)
She loves to tuck her puppy into 'bed' before heading to bed herself. We have a makeshift bed (just for puppy, near her cot) where she lays her down, tucks her in with a blanket and they lays down and kisses and cuddles her before saying SHUSSSSSH and heading off to her own cot to go to sleep. So so so sweet.
One copy of INVINCIBLE SUMMER and one CD of INVINCIBLE SUMMER'S PLAYLIST, as well as one signed bookmark.
It could be said that John Huston created the template for the private eye movie with his version of The Maltese Falcon; I think the same is also true of The Asphalt Jungle (1950) and the heist movie. In terms of plotting and development, this film lays out the pattern that almost all subsequent efforts have followed. Others have played around with the structure and characterization within this sub-genre, but the basic concept of a group of professional thieves assembling to plan and execute a raid before seeing everything fall apart remains the standard formula to this day. Aside from its influential status, The Asphalt Jungle is also a first-rate film noir and a compelling crime drama. Unlike Criss Cross or The Killers, the gang are not foiled by a scheming femme fatale or by having their judgement clouded by emotion. Instead, their downfall is hastened by mistrust born of greed and the little glitches that even the coolest planner couldn’t hope to foresee.
Within minutes, I was convinced Mr. Cunningham was no mere mortal. His artistic passion is so uncompromisingly beautiful that he disregards romantic relationships, base needs, social standing etc. He does whatever he wants. He tore up checks from Conde Naste because, “if they give you money, they own you.” He is an artistic aesthete I’ve never experienced in my life. He’s described by fashionistas and titans of the fashion industry as ‘the most important man in the world’. And yet, he’s this 90lb bag of bones and pixie-dust jam who doesn’t even stop hiding in the sidelines and snapping shots at his own awards show. No, he is not a man. He’s a demigod, a nymph displaced from the ancient forest to the urban millennium, drifting about civilization, observing and yet never disrupting. He does not review. He does not analyze. He simply watches. When told to differentiate street fashion as ‘in’ or ‘out’ he returned with the agonizingly egalitarian, and bewitchingly brilliant “if they’re wearing it, it’s ‘in’. Everything is ‘in’” (paraphrase, sorry). In no way does he create trends. He’s a cultural scientist of such blissful objectivity that he can simply observe. He does not partake in the slightest, never accepting so much as a glass of water at events and sporting a duct-taped poncho when it rains because, “why buy a new one? It’ll just rip in the same places.”
We talked about the office of President of the United States and all agreed that we wouldn't want it for all the tea in China. Like Lucretia Garfield, we appreciate the privacy and comfort of home. We're thankful there are men (and certainly someday women) who are up to the task.
Boo. Sweat. Hiss. Sweat.
Meanwhile, I signed up for internet last night, so I should have my own super-fast signal in exactly one week. Until then, it's very difficult to post pictures (I tried to add a photo to this post and it just would not work), and thus writing posts with pictures of all my travels is pointless right now. I think I got a pretty good deal - three months free plus 10,000 yen to spend at the electronics store where I signed up for service. I get the feeling it's the same offer everywhere as I checked a few places. I might get a printer or router, if the price is right.
Shark Cage Diving
150g icing sugar
In spite of all this, the people Kong Hee endorses are issues themselves (Steve Munsey, John Avanzini, Yonngi Cho, etc).
We’ve been doing really well lately, no leftovers for anything!
Before anyone comes to the conclusion that this energy is the energy of the meatheaded jerk, keep in mind that the body part ruled by Aries is the head, the top of the body, the first part of us to enter the world. Aries is innovative and pioneering, but is different from the spirit that rules say, Aquarius. Aries is the energy of the courageous trailblazer in the wilderness, settling towns. It is the excitement of the navigator as he sails across the ocean to lands unknown, perfectly willing to sail off the edge of the earth, or venture into the boiling sea, where “there be monsters.” Aries wants to fly to the moon, not only so he can be the first to do it (though that is a big ego boost), but to prove to others that it can be done. Aries trusts that it will survive, with at least a great story to tell, if not a world changing discovery.
By now police had been alerted to what was going on. One of the first to arrive, Billy Speed, was hiding behind the thick stone balustrade beside the statue of Jefferson Davis, south of the southern plaza and north of the South Mall along Inner Campus Drive, but he was shot nonetheless, though it’s unclear as to whether that was due to a really well-placed shot or a ricochet. The next victim, repairman Roy Dell Schmidt, was shot by his truck, south of Littlefield Fountain on Twenty-first.
I saw my break coming & made a rush to get out! Once I got out, I noticed the sun was about to be swallowed by a second cloud!
Excuses for the pretentious name: done.
The article below was written for an American audience, but it applies equally well to the state of affairs in South Africa, and other parts of the world. It does not tackle the issue of race-mixing directly as such, but lectures to the gradual incursion of the Whiteman’s domain by intolerant and demanding foreigners. History has shown that the White Race has always been resilient enough to withstand incursions of this nature, but times are changing fast, and the numbers don’t balance anymore! The current state of affairs will most definitely lead to intermarriage with other groups. Some will argue that it will be the only route to survival, but I disagree, as this is the quickest route to definite suicide!
Adults aged over 45 are three times as likely to drink alcohol every day as those aged under 45, results of a lifestyle survey suggest.
As I had reached teenage years by then, I slowly started to understand the lessons you had taught us. You taught me my love for our heritage. And there is more than just an old man’s ramblings in history lessons. You took me to my first Pow Wow, taught me how to make fry bread, how to protect my house and my loved ones with prayer and positive precautions like smudging the house with sage, keeping lavender in the corners, and salt across my doorways. When I was old enough you started to teach me responsibility by giving me a job in your shop. The tasks ranged from cleaning up, to helping customer, to filing paper work. Still through all the years, you stressed the importance of studies and good character, while not forgetting to live.
He already forgave us.
Where English is the primary language, today is celebrated as Good Friday.
This is the way that I can stop chasing that something in the black forest and stand still. Stand still and let it come to me, turn on the light, and look at the scariest parts of me in the eye. I’m still a (mostly) lone wolf. But he’s a calm, well-fed lone wolf.
1 tsp sea salt or to taste
Moat
At some malls, women purchase the item, and then go into the ladies restroom to try on the clothing. If it doesn’t fit and she wants to try a different size, she must go back to the store, go through an exchange process for a different size and repeat the scenario in the mall’s restrooms, trying on the clothing again. But of course, when you go back to the shop, it may be closed for prayer times, in which case you would have to wait around to make the exchange. But some women are not able to try on the clothing in the restroom before they leave the mall, so these women have to wait until they return home to try on the clothing. If the item doesn’t fit, she must make another trip back to the store to exchange or return it, bothering hubby again or taking another taxi ride and timing the trip so the shop will not be closed for prayers.
And I love that it's the city where I fell in love. Where I met my beautiful, kind, and caring wife, whose heart is as big as California itself. Who took me in not despite but because of eccentricities. It was in this landscape where we first looked deeply into each others eyes and saw the future spread out fifty years before us. And it was always here. Right here.
On the baby front-- Miss Priss refused to turn-- so now we are scheduled for a C-section on July 6th-- a week from tomorrow!! I can honestly say I am BEYOND ready for her to be here-- and OUT of my aching body! Between achy back, hips, etc... and the HEAT and HUMIDITY (I'm sorry-- it's ridiculous to be 80 degrees at 9am!)
A great example of this is Jesus himself. In the Jewish culture, at the age of about 5 boys would have gone with their fathers daily. Jesus would have gone to work with Joseph. While Joseph was doing carpentry Jesus would have been at his side the entire day. During the course of that day, the five year old boy would have been observing his father doing what a man does. No matter how amazing your mom is she is still a woman. She can tell you what she thinks a man is. However, she can never witness to you the fullness of what being a man is. So, even Mary, the perfect woman, could not have aided Jesus in quest for manhood. Boys need their fathers. Nothing is more evident to me than that. I work with boys everyday, who have never met nor do they have a father in their life. They are all reaching out in anger for attention and mentorship. They pick on weaker kids, they fight, they drink, they get high, they are failing out of school, they have been placed in alternative schools. And, I say all the time it is due to the lack of fatherhood in their lives. Yet, no one around me seems to want to acknowledge that very simple and obvious fact. Perhaps, it is fear of offending single mothers, perhaps it is the pervasive liberal feminist ideology, perhaps it is simply ignorance. Whatever, the reason, there is a crisis in this country and it is the death of manhood. If we wish to recover it, we must first acknowledge it.
On Wednesday night we went to the Winter Quarters Musical called "Come Home to Kanesville." The musical was put on at the Kanesville Tabernacle where Brigham Young was set apart as prophet of the church many, many, many years ago.
Take Koy, a very pleasing and popular 24-year-old massage girl from the Northern Region of Isaan, who earns about $2000 monthly-an enormous sum for massage girl or any Pattaya worker for that matter. Yet, Koy, who says that she’s had hundreds of sexual play-for-pay offers and hundreds of marriage proposals in the few years she’s worked massage, she steadfastly refuses to sexually satisfy any customer for any amount of money. She relies on her professionalism and her charm to win over all customers-keeping them coming back for more time and time again.
A closer look at three key attributes of God should help you understand.
El circulo rojo que sacaste del troquelador Itti Bitty
Flash forward to my bank account being $75 less and I am the proud owner of Fish Oil, Vitamin D, Vitamin B/Magnesium stress complex, and Rhodiola. Ten minutes ago I knocked all four of these babies back with a glass of water and a banana. I’m not usually one to take pills, let alone four, so I’m thinking my body might internally combust in a massive release of previously unknown energy. If you don’t hear from me soon I might be burning down H Street or going for a jog. It’s a 50/50 toss up.
27And when the sun went down, they were taken down from the trees, by Joshua’s orders, and put into the hole where they had gone to be safe; and great stones were placed at the mouth of the hole, where they are to this day.
shimmering elm arms stretched wide,
Other Beth Moore Studies I did were: Fruit of the Spirit, Daniel, which were good too. I highly recommend this to anyone looking for a challenge who likes a good Bible study.
if you didn’t read venus capriccio i’ll just say it again: the art is GORGEOUS! i’m sorry i used the summary from mangahere but i just couldn’t find the right words to summarize the manga! and it was driving me crazy.
Unless you’re reading from a script, a phone call is an organic communication. Your thoughts come out unfiltered and inherently
In other words, don’t fall into the trap of talking about job titles and status, talk about how you envisage your working life to be. That way, they will find it a lot more difficult to rule you out on the basis that you are asking for something they are unable or unwilling to offer.
Take a teaspoonful of mix and roll into a little ball, place on a lined baking tray and flatten slightly with a fork or I just used my finger. Fill up the baking tray (or a few) and bake for 10 - 15 minutes in a 180 degree (celsius) oven. Now my new oven is hot hot hot so I had to watch these babies in the oven. In the end I lowered my temp to 170 but see how you go. Just watch them closely. Remove cookies with a fork (they'll be a bit soft), cool on cooking rack and enjoy.
Some hours later the vet called again. She was very sorry, but she had only bad news. The abscess was in the wall of the small intestine and had damaged this as well when it ruptured. In addition there were multiple adhesions (internal scar tissue that connect tissues not normally connected) between different sections of the intestines and a bad case of peritonitis.
So I worked for him from the first day I moved in with him. I was working 6 to 7 days a week, 10 hours a day (+ extra work at home on the evenings and on my days off), never had weekends off or holidays. He was not paying me, he thought that having me live under his roof and feeding me was enough (shall I mention the house was awful, mice were coming in, you could feel the air through the windows and mushrooms were growing in the bathroom and the wardrobe destroying most of my clothes…and I was only allowed to buy basic cheap food which made me put on weight)
Napoleon Kitten
Guest DJ Robert Alexander (His first gig ever)
2. Similarly, baking soda will keep away garbage odors; sprinkle the bottom of the pail, and then sprinkle again after you put a new bag in.
Summary: Destiny Faraday makes a point of keeping her distance from her classmates at Hedgebrook Academy. Her number-one rule: Don’t get attached. But one day, unexpectedly finding a car at their disposal, Destiny and three of her classmates embark on an unauthorized road trip.
Not everyone is going to be happy in life. Not everyone is going to be kind and thoughtful towards others. Not everyone holds themselves to high standards of self awareness, their thoughts and lives are focused elsewhere, and I can't change that about people.
Most websites don’t take advantage of interactivity: they present and that is it. Blogs, on the other hand, are designed to invite participation and use the medium more to advantage. Virtual reality takes participation to another level—one where preferences of the market become very obvious. The more engaging an experience, the more popular it can become.
That’s what I call Country Boy Jambalaya.
HOMEMADE TOOTHPASTE
First, the MCAC has yet to be set up but more importantly, it’s structure, appointment of top officials and the nitty gritty of it’s expanded powers has yet to be clarified. Who cares if the MCAC has 20,000 or even 100,000 officers if it is not given adequate powers nor sufficiently transparent. For that matter, it isn’t even clear what sort of a Parliamentary Committee the MCAC would be reporting to. As a matter of good governance such a Parliamentary Committee should include members of the Opposition as well.
I feel like I've been doing parties for so long that I don't know how to make cards anymore... I struggled to create this one for the newest MIM challenge: mixing scraps to create background paper.
Moreover, the example of one movement could and did provide inspiration for other movements. A good example would be the feminist movement in the United States, which grew directly out of the experience that the women in civil rights organizations, where they developed skills to organize against their own repression experienced on a society-wide level while confronting the sexism they experienced within the civil rights movements.
the launching service in MYC;
We love questions, so if you have more, keep them coming!
Watch on
As I sat on the upper banks of the Arkansas River on Friday evening, taking my time to eat the pasta I had made the day before out of my giant Tupperware bowl listening to the water roll by, I couldn’t help but feel contented for the first time in quite a while. The sun was beginning to set behind me, throwing dramatic shadows on the mountains that line the river, and I was grateful for the opportunity I had to make it in time to check in and really relax before the race the next morning.
The Last Plea Bargain
“Second. I will try to learn and do His will by forming the habit of praying and carefully reading my Bible daily, and by thinking, speaking, and acting as I believe He would in my place. . . .” (Clark, Christian Endeavor, supra, p. 253).
Concerned by water shortages in the south of England, film-maker Rory Macleod challenged his brother Tom to see if he could survive using 35 litres of water a day … but started off asking him how much water he thought he used during a day.
And also...
Coffee and oranges in a sunny chair,
Curry Leaves – 5
The fun part of this project is that it's also perfect for creating picnic themed favors. You'll definitely want to file this technique away for the upcoming summer months.
We from Malaysian media civil society organisations condemn the arrest of two journalists and police violence towards others who were covering the sit-down protest for free and fair elections in Kuala Lumpur on 28 April 2012.
All the un-felt emotions are ready to be felt and dealt with. This usually ends up in me getting up very early, doing things around the house I usually put off for “another day” and trying to get myself together.
Mercy Gale was born in the year 1710 . She was my 6th great grandmother. This piece was created to honor her.
That’s it. That is enough to make me crazy(ier!)
And sure enough, I went back to old blog posts and found perhaps-not-quite-definitive-but-close-enough passages like this:
I usually draw on what ever paper is laying around.
I have worked through tough times before, and I will again. But that is not the problem. The puzzle (more than a problem) is to bring the work forward into new forms. Alice, my assistant, went out to talk to the galleries a few months ago. She is good, just visits. People are always happy to see her. She tells me that work framed under glass is not selling well. I guessed at this, and thought about my own environment. I prefer something on/in fabric, canvas, clay, paper, wood, bone, stone, with no glass to isolate.. I look at a computer about as much as I can tolerate. Looking at, or through glass. A world so non-physical there , so dead, so frustrating, so empty no matter how many stories, or comments or ideas.
“Really? We have about a hundred, too,” I said while nodding.
Back to the speech, “Your parents have invested their hopes and dreams in you—probably somewhere between $50,000 and $100,000. They actually do expect you to get a job and move out. That is not likely to happen. The least you can do is to try to be helpful around the house, but neither of your parents believes this will happen.”
After stamping the bunnies, snip them apart so they can be in different position in different places on the card or used alone depending on the expression you need, smiling or giggling!
It appears Jenna Bouvier is losing everything: beauty, family, and wealth. When her controlling and emotionally abusive mother-in-law accuses Jenna of an affair with her spiritual director and threatens to expose them, Jenna also risks losing her reputation as a woman of faith. Will she capitulate to her mother-in-law’s wishes again or fight for what she holds dear? As Jenna loses her life, will she find it?
As when a black cloud shews its lightnings to the silent deep.
Now, it turned out, involved a visit to the Orthopaedic Surgeon to discuss the options. I was told that she could have Botox injections in all the muscle groups in her legs to encourage lengthening which would be assisted by casting both legs in plaster once the injections had been done. It could be done under anaesthetic but why waste anaesthetic when I could just hold her down? Seriously? Needless to say, I did not like that man. I didn’t “gel” with him. And if I don’t “gel” with a doctor we have a problem. A big fat problem called “I’m never going back to that man again” This problem was unfortunately compounded by the fact that at the time he was the only Paediatric Orthopaedic surgeon in the city. Seriously?!?!?!!?
Today I got round to merging the two chairs, I've taken the office chair and basically fixed the rocker from the rocking chair onto the bottom of it, it's worked better than I thought, but it will need some tidying up, that's if I can get it back from the kids who have decided it's theirs now, I had thought I'd use it as a gaming chair, so much for that idea.
But I bow my head,
In a sneak peek of the 1,445 words column with two footnotes, Gaga explains her fashion credential, saying:
No problem, I'll tell you exactly what it is. It is an annoying little feature that makes readers/commenters have to verify that they are indeed human before being able to leave you a comment on your blog. I have over 200+ blogs that I subscribe to online and as I age, I guarantee you that it will increase! So when I take the time to commentor give you some feedback, I expect to leave my comments without any hassle. Word verification is a big hassle. In fact, sometimes it takes me 2-5 tries before I'm able to leave some compliments on your blog and by that time, you're lucky I haven't even given up! It frustrates me to no end when I've tried that many times to "prove that I'm not a robot."
This is an absolutely standard Ashford wheel, which means that spare bobbins should be easy to come by.
Yes, Jesus, I want to be on your right or your left side, (Yes) Not for any selfish reason.
" Smitten is a Fredericksburg original.
Today is our showcase of "Claire's ABCs". This 4" x 6" set is the next installment in our ABCs series. It is a fun font that also matches our Bright Side stickers! The design team has made the most amazing samples! We also have a little video on the bottom showcasing some fun ways of using the set!
Matthew 6:6 But thou, when thou prayest, enter into thy closet, and when thou hast shut thy door, pray to thy Father which is in secret; and thy Father which seeth in secret shall reward thee openly.
I'm sure you don't even realize it but you have all touched my life. Over the years you have shared your artistic talents with me in creations of your LOST art, pictures, videos, music, fan fiction, articles, blogs and podcasts. Early on you literally taught me how to use photo editing programs so that I could start creating my Silly LOST Pictures that I would lovingly share with all of you. You made me feel special with all the comments, created image comments and greetings, messages, emails and the many gifts you have sent my way. Thank you all for this amazing experience!
Lawyers representing the city claimed that female bartenders would cause morality problems. "It is the city’s position that there is a danger to the public health, safety and welfare and that morals are in fact going to be endangered." They argued that female bartenders would "hypnotize" and "mesmerize" their male patrons, causing them to drink too much and cause trouble.
do you know how I adore you?
Clannad Theme from Harry’s game IRL
Okay, I think that's it? Phew, I'm exhausted a little. (I never predict the short categories because I'm not THAT kind of insane.)
I'm definitely going to do this style album again.
Submitted by Threeze Sharpensteen
I think she liked teenagers because that is where her self image stopped growing. In her mind she was perpetually that pretty girl who the boys sought after, going to parties and hanging out with her friends. Once we became grown and had families of our own, her interest in our lives
With a potentially difficult client dynamic, I suggest they create a mood board of images of interiors they don't like. This can be quite a revealing exercise and, often, it's their dislikes that will unite them. Another thing to do, is to arrange meetings earlier in the day. I find the later the meeting, the more tired and less flexible clients can sometimes be.
Margaret was a quiet woman, soft-spoken, like really SOFT - you actually had to listen carefully when she spoke - she didn't seek the limelight - her way was to be one of the people laying out the bricks, slapping on the mortar, making sure our nascent organization was growing on strong foundations.
-Enter the Cage, Adema
I have one word for these cookie: Yum! The triple chocolate consists of cocoa powder, semi-sweet chocolate chips and Hershey's Kisses. I really liked that they offered variations. Instead of regular Kisses, they suggested Kisses with Almonds (I didn't use those because I wasn't sure if the kiddos would like it). I think they would be good with any variety of Kisses, or Hugs for that matter. There is also a variation for a vanilla cookie instead of chocolate, but then they wouldn't be triple chocolate, just double. These are so good, I wish I could convince my husband that Tony wouldn't oppose to me eating more.
Why isn't actor Caleb Steinmeyer getting more offers?
The weather gnomes are cruel. Today was May morning. It rained. It has been raining for a week and the temperature hasn’t been higher than fifteen degrees (that would be Celsius. Thank God. For the Celsius-illiterate, amongst whom I count myself unless I have an Internet conversion-rate website to hand, it’s been in the mid-to-low fifties, Fahrenheit.)
Nowhere here looks like a home.
Oct-22 Brooklyn, NY Barclays Center On Sale Fri. Apr. 27
Most melodramatic moment – being so condescending about the Wombats song 1996 in CD 3. It’s such a great song, and actually has something worthwhile to say about the world. Also, being unable to pick a favourite song.
This rule applies to three or more in a series. Not a pair. 
Suspected burglar Hill had been escorted outside to wait for transport after he was remanded in custody.
THE CANDYLAND CARCRASH/SERAPHIM - "A Rockt Trip to the Moon" Split 7" (Black) Small Craft Advisory
So after laying all cards down, the CEO asked him if he’s up for the task – to lead, to put his people before himself and to nurture them as professionals and individuals and in turn, magnify the organisation’s success.
WE HAVE OPENINGS FOR THE NEXT KINO SHORTS NIGHT AND WANT YOUR NEW SHORT FILMS NOW !
You can even see the corner of my card
-Don’t do stunts and fancy tricks on the road. Leave that to the Vaudeville stage.
If you live in Brisbane or nearby regions, you might want to share your poems with an appreciative audience at the monthly Speedpoets event. I have been there, and the audience is very supportive towards fellow poets. A great atmosphere.
After the surgery we found out she had removed a 16-pound mass from his abdomen. It was the biggest lipoma she had ever seen. Buster recovered (after one little mishap when he managed to prematurely remove his own stitches, leading to another surgery to repair the damage), and through the process he formed a special bond with Dr. Faulkner and made a lasting impression on the rest of the veterinary staff.
I think I have a lot of stuff going on inside my own head that needs to be meshed out... and I think all of that black gobbeldy-gook (yes, a technical term here) needs to be cleaned up before I can focus my energy on the outside of me. Anyone out there experience this ever?
Now, this is not news. Things have been weird in this long-term relationship (so to speak) for quite some time. I stopped taking Seroquel — three years ago this month, thank you — went through fierce withdrawal and the most extreme mania of my life, and everything changed, for me. Through it all he stood on the sidelines, shouting that I would diiiiiiie.
I decided to make a post about GERD because most of the people doesn't know about it although they may sometimes felt the same feelings, signs and symptoms but they does not know what it is, sad to say but I personally is having this and it's so annoying!!! it was first started after giving birth to my 3rd child I think?because that's also the start of a sudden weight lost, I have a bloated stomach before and after eating so I can't eat as much as I want, I'm having a heart burn until I palpitate so often, I thought it was just because I'm also a coffee person and palpitations was just normal if you drink coffee but I started to reduce coffee intake but the feeling was still remains I often felt stomach pain that hurts, so I decided to consult my cardiologist and internist and found out I'm having a GERD (Gastroesophangeal Reflux Disease) and my doctor prescribe "Nexium" . after taking it for two weeks ( if I'm not mistaken because it's been almost 3 yrs. ago) I was a total relieved for me palpitations just ease and pain subsides but then again... I'm just a person, I got pregnant again and history repeats it's self LOL! means I started to feel the acid reflux again, some palpitations ans stomach pain but more severe this time...
If you ask me, it always will be.
Have a great weekend everybody!
I’ve been walking a lot more than before, climbing more onto places, and except for coming home from the vet and hiding in my crate for a few hours (ssstttrrrreeessssss….), haven’t been hiding or anything. I’ve even been swatting my sisters. My walk is changing, and I’m feeling a bit better. If I could just get to the top of that damned cat perch, we’d be golden! I’m pretty sure I could do it now, I just think that the climb down might be a bit challenging.
Well, I am soooo jet lagged from my trip to Hawaii. AKA: I can’t wait to tell you about my trip. Which I plan to do next week, once the official vacation photographer (my sister, Natasha) shares all the pictures with me.
Blank inside so you can write the real excuse. A gorgeous pomeranian puppy having a snooze because all that eating homework is so exhausting!
Differential turnout is something that could also have a huge effect on the decision, since Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland are all electing devolved institutions, with 60% turnout expected, whilst those areas that have local elections (like Ipswich) will be lucky to reach 40%.
To make the challenge even more fun, we will be giving out a prize, a $15 gift certificate to be used toward stamps at the Our Daily Bread Designs store!! Entries for the prize must be submitted by Friday, December 23 ., 2011 at 8 a.m. EST. One random winner will be chosen and announced next Saturday. If you are not using ODBD stamps, please do not enter more than once. Additional entries without using ODBD stamps will not be commented on or will they qualify for prizes.
Now on to the article. This is the list that a woman made for her sons of life lessons she deemed important. I have to say I totally agree. The author has asked me to remove the article from my blog, but you can read her article via.
I see the dreams
Fruit: One serve of fruit is 150 grams of fresh fruit or:
All art is at once surface and symbol. Those who go beneath the surface do so at their peril. Those who read the symbol do so at their peril.
This week has been especially tiresome, stress inducing..bordering down right depressing. So what does one do when feeling the blahs? She goes shopping! It's even better when the scores are AWESOMELY priced!!
20. Slumdog Millionaire – A recent addition to the list! I put off watching this because so often Academy winners are not as great as claimed to be, but in this case it’s true.
Residents along Chenery Street in Glen Park have been perplexed in recent days to learn they live on a hill. Common sense would say the stretch just east of the canyon is flat, but when you’re talking about the Municipal Transportation Agency, common sense doesn’t always come into play.
The large wooden box (from the set of boxes) was altered by, first, giving it a coat of paint. Then I glued on some 7 gypsies papers. When the glue dried, I sanded back all the paper edges to give them an aged worn look. I used my Versamagic chalk inks to add more distressing (gingerbread and turquoise gem).
15. You Took Me By Surprise
However, it’s probably best known as “The Village” in The Prisoner, a 1960s spy drama starring Patrick McGoohan, a show which subsequently inspired a cult following. Portmeirion still hosts annual fan conventions and not far from the entrance there is a shop, once serving as McGoohan’s home in the show, which sells Prisoner souvenirs. I’ve seen a couple of episodes of the series and while it was probably quite innovative and challenging for the day it seemed to me like so much hyper-active nonsense, George Orwell by way of Magical Mystery Tour, the sort of thing that I’m sure went down very well in the swinging psychedelic sixties!
We turn to gurus to help us deal with our feelings of helplessness. And we contribute to their empires. If they are good gurus, we are blessed. If they are crooks, we feel cheated once more.
_____Wow, I must have super powers, just melted a piece of ice by staring at it. Took a little longer than I thought it would, but..
Should I choose Perrier… or its competitor, San Pellegrino? Well take your pick, for they are both owned and bottled by the Nestle’ Corporation (a government controlled entity).
The team went 27-0 this year during the regular season. It has achieved perfection so far and they hope to continue that during the playoffs that start today, Thursday Nov. 17.
How long did it take you to write "Gathering String": About 6 years. The journalism business kept changing. Lots of rewriting was involved.
I ordered just before easter so there was a slight delay in receiving the items which according to reviews are usually quickly delivered in around 1-2 days after ordering. on receiving my order I sat down with the boys and had a good olde sniffing session and I was pleasantly surprised by the scents. It’s hard to describe exactly how they smell but if I compare them to Yankee candles they are much more true to scent and much milder. The watermelon actually smells like watermelon and is strong enough to make the whole downstairs smell delicious but not so strong it causes a headache. I was so impressed I made another order the same day for more breakables and a couple of daylights which are larger versions of tealights. They also have an impressive selection of burners in various styles starting from just £4 so I treated myself to a new burner aswell (picture at the top of the review) I have since tried a few other scents in the Yankee candle range but I personally find them too strong and artificial smelling when compared to Kringle.
I've received many comments about this post and recently many have ran along a certain vein which bears clarification.
With his vast fortune, Gulen established the Justice and Democratic Party (Adalet ve Kalkinma or AKP) which gained control of Turkey in 2002.
The most significant and at the time, most fearful changes in my life I resisted and fought. But once I learned to see them as they were; not as I wanted them; and then embraced them, the changes always turned out to be for my higher good. Stephen Monahan, Change Agent, life coach
The first lessons had to deal with 'pegs'. The narrator had likened them to wooden dowels, but once I heard the word 'pegs upon a wall', my wild imagination had put pirates on the other side with only their peg-legs sticking out from what we were seeing.
I’ve gotta serve
We primarily do this during our study of history through our Tapestry of Grace curriculum. However, we have frequent discussions about other religions as we walk through our week. We talk about a lot of different subjects around the dinner table, and the subject of religions naturally comes up. We were careful as we began to introduce this subject. We made certain our children had a good basis in Scripture first. However, if we’re going to educate our kids with a Christian worldview, we think that it’s important that they understand both the fact that there are other religions, and that those religions are incompatible with Christianity (and why).
“Masuzoe also indicated that Japan would move to stage three of its action plan to treat the virus this week, based on the possibility that infections have reached epidemic proportions in Japan.
a big Santa, the Snowman family and other items
“The Growth of Low Skill Service Jobs and the Polarization of the U.S. Labor Market”
If you do not have the words yourself use other people's words, there are great writers whose words we must spread to those who remain blind to what is happening. On this blog we have Mister Fox, August Pointneuf, Robin Hind, Reconquista (how I wish I could convince him to start writing again) Tim Hayden, Dr. D, Alan O'Reilly and others, please spread their words.
When we have chosen to follow Christ Jesus, but get some bad moments, what do we do than? As we begin to suffer as Jesus did (for doing the right things, for righteousness sake) are we than willing to be strong enough to continue the right path? Are we than stable enough to stay erect and go through the storm?
Dressed from head to toe in the remains of my own dirty and misspelt big words.
9. Because The Bachelorette + 100 degrees + 100 percent humidity = glowing, dewy, radiant goddess. While Mikalee + 100 degrees + 100 percent humidity = Your. Worst. Nightmare.
3.STATE OF ALERT "Public Defender"
And that is why Beachside Properties Inc. didn’t place their Chancery Lane – Long Beach reports on the internet for all to see.
This is an event that some of you know that happened in my life…one of the ways God directly answered me, in a really miraculous and wonderful way. It’s not my salvation experience. It actually happened 18 years after I became born again.
* The first Levi Jeans were made from hemp.
Of lavender dreams white tea
ummm... I would have to say jelly beans!!! :)
We got out of the quad room because I woke up with bug bites all over my arms, ankles and neck. (And I didn't go outside the day before.) Itchy dance!
At the weekend, while the kids were in softplay and hubby was skiing, I sketched a few ideas to change an existing necklace into a less chunky version.
~ Pan fry the fish bone and beans with a little oil until fragnant.
Heat your oven to 200C (180C Fan) Gas Mark 6. Tip the chickpeas onto a baking tray with the vegetable oil, season and shake to coat, then bake for 25mins.
When Ariel saw her cupcake, she said, "Cupcakes for breakfast? Oh man... all I had this morning was seaweed!"
So is it really that the movie manipulated her emotions, or that it attempted to manipulate her emotions and failed — and the failure is a let-down? Is it like a magician who promises to mesmerize but relies upon cheap tricks?
I put a safety pin through one end then grappled it through the tunnel. This was quite fiddly - please let me know if there is an easier way. It also didn't help when the pin unpinned itself halfway through.
when I made you up
This smart show declares this kind of old school thinking tired and outdated. It sees contemporary photography at the nexus of interdisciplinary art making, where the definitional intersections between traditional photography and painting, sculpture, performance art, collage, computer-based art, and other less well defined genres are less clear or even important. Processes and techniques from various disciplines are layered on top of each other, creating hybridized end products that defy easy categorization. We're now living in the in-between spaces and borderlands of art, where the rules are less well enforced and the outcomes less predictable, and this multivalent thinking is offering new avenues for exploration and experimentation.
Shotgun blast hit his chest, left nothing inside.
Whenever I find myself
To be honest I dont know that Dad's are all that fussed are they?
Here are a few photos from my trip,
First of all, thank you for clicking through! I appreciate your visit. Please look around and check out some of my earlier posts. My writing covers a lot of great topics, including outdoor adventure, simplicity, running, spirituality, and business productivity.
And construction. Yes, the ceiling in the front bedroom is getting new sheetrock. This means we are ever closer to moving the Toika upstairs.
My gut responses:
NHK.
Snacks: Was very hungry, so had a bowl of fruit pieces, apple+berries+grapes
Figure 3: A comparison between quarterly household consumption expenditure growth, industrial production growth, GDP growth, unemployment and effective exchange rates. Source: Eurostat.
75. Sex, Lies & Videotape (James Spader)
Another “Stories From Upon the Wall” story – with an imaginary book title.
By Steve Benen - Fri Apr 6, 2012 2:46 PM EDT.
Funny enough, even while stumping for his favourite political party, he couldn’t help but acknowledge a brutal truth about this particular survey – that nobody in Iceland would believe it. Gissurarson’s second fact about Icelanders: “It is in the Icelandic mindset not to complain, at least not in public, but to put a brave face on circumstances.”
"CONTROL was conceived as a secret American spy agency focused solely on defeating KAOS, an international organization committed to doing everything they can to create, well, chaos," offers Ewing. "The two are eternally opposing forces that, in the larger sense, represent good and evil." And, in the "Get Smart" sense, represent myriad opportunities for comedy.
Approaching Storm:
and the dust returns to the earth as it was, and the spirit returns to God who gave it.
Place them in a baking dish, and repeat with the remaining shanks. Add additional oil and butter if needed.
baffled and overwhelmed. And so what happened next, I suspect, is that I rather fell into the trap of assuming that, given both the seriousness of what had come to pass and the presence of a new and surprisingly concerned audience, all anybody could possibly want to hear from me – be it through tweets or status updates or whatever – were Bullshit bulletins… which, I imagine, did the exact opposite of rescuing people from having their arses bored off.
I leaned back in (‘cause love would, right?)
It was very dis-heartening, but we know that God has a plan for us, and so the job search continues.
Doctor says if it happens again, next time he ain't gonna save me
It’s easy to see when looking back but harder to do while in the middle of it all.
Sabre Dance (Khachaturian) 2:45
I'm finally home and unpacking; such a job! i just want to get everything where it needs to be so i can get to the fun stuff...making new curtains for the livingroom, making a rag rug for the kitchen, building some cool pallet shelves for my cookbooks, build a canopy toddler bed for the babes...the list goes on.
I'm planning on signing up for Snap perks on Facebook because honestly, I could handle winning some amazing prizes right now! The Scotts Snap Perk Program starts March 7, 2012 so make sure you head there and Like their page!
Boehner said his offer that included some $800 billion in new tax revenue and massive spending cuts was never withdrawn. That plan was dubbed the “grand bargain” despite his decision to walk away from negotiations with Obama last week.
Things are moving right along with my Kitchen Pantry project - shelves and walls have been painted, I have made some organizing baskets, added some lighting and labeled my canisters.
EJ - he's doing well overall. As I type this, he is hanging upside down on the barstool while he eats his dinner. LOL. He has a fantastic teacher this year who seems to be doing the right thing - he comes home a lot calmer than he did last year, and she is a very dear and sweet girl. I like her - sometimes when I come to the class to pick EJ up for different therapies, she is on the floor with the kids, teaching them or doing some sort of activity. EJ likes going to his therapists which is good, considering they deliberately push his buttons to make him react a certain way or to do things he doesn't want to do. He likes leaving school at lunchtimes to go and see them and do something different. EJ knows he has Aspergers, we gave him a book "All Cats Have Aspergers" which the first time he read it, laughed so hard he nearly pee'd himself! By the second time, he knew that HE had Aspergers. When he behaves in his quirky little way, he explains it by saying "I have Aspergers". Earlier on he asked "Why do I have Aspergers?" so we told him that God thought that EJ would make a great kid with Aspergers, and that it wasn't a sickness, it was just different and special. God chose him because He knew that EJ could change the world with his incredible gifts and way of seeing the world. He seemed happy with that.
Now Amy must race to unlock Godspeed’s hidden secrets. But out of her list of murder suspects, there’s only one who matters: Elder, the future leader of the ship and the love she could never have seen coming.
Rissad glanced past Rel's shoulder once, then turned, leaning heavily on his torch. Telling himself it was just because he needed to watch the approaching Wilder, Rel turned his back on the Gatemaker, but the shuffling sound of Rissad's uneven step stayed with him. Ahead, the silver-skinned Wilder glided forward, its feet spread wider than its shoulders as it walked.
Almost done. Wish me luck!
Attendees will enjoy a unique opportunity to get acquainted on new art trends that have emerged on the art scene in the few last decades such as: digital art, holograms, Art 2.0, bio art, performances and enactments, language and law based art, appropriationism and sampling, sound and ambient art, street art and so on.
That next week I met Autumn and her foster parents at our office. I wanted this young woman to understand how I would become part of her life and that I wanted to build a trusting relationship with her. I told her how I could help her with her SAT preparation, her resume and her college essays. She immediately said “Cool, when are you coming over? I’m free next week”. I was so excited that Autumn was going to allow me into her life and listen to my advice and essentially allow me to lead her. That next week I went to her foster home and we began our mentor/mentee relationship. That was three months ago and it has been going fantastically. Together, we’ve revamped her resume and she’s gotten a few job interviews, I’ve gotten her interested in summer camp and even thinking about taking an SAT prep course.
Claire:-I’m Claire from Kent in the UK, married to Gary, we have gorgeous twin daughters Madison & Tiegan who are now four.
the continued, but healthier, relationship with my parents.
Moving out of my apartment week.
Etihad, which is owned by the Abu Dhabi government, carried 8.3 million passengers last year and serves 84 passenger and cargo destinations in the…..
The graffiti against the wall and up the iron stair is pretty indecipherable as writing, but the visual impact of the glowing color seems to tie everything together into a worn collage made of "found" objects. Almost like an art installation put together with elements hoarded by the neighborhood.
Any career that deals with a lot of people on a very personal level starts becoming hard to be out in, because you never know whose toes you could be stepping on. In everyday life you will step on some toes and hopefully never see the person again. In your work life it could risk the failure of a project, a client’s relationship to you, and a whole career.
Perhaps you've noticed that although I'm talking about music which means the most for me on this blog, I don't reach for hyperbole often. Aside from considerations of taste that inform my writing approach, there's a deeper reason for this. Frenzied praise common to most music reviews (and at the altera pars, cynical deconstruction) I believe are reflexes of self-obfuscation. They focus the reading on the supposedly valiant feats/grave evils the music is impacting on its own, cutting out the perception and life experience of the writer. This is the way to market to one and all. What I am trying to do with this blog is not to domesticate the art in this way, it is to connect disparate personal experiences, aesthetic charges semi-inherent in the form and reaching theory into a whole that is more exuberant and startling in its chaotic non-clarity than any riff or song on itself can accomplish in its disconnected safety. There's nothing to be impressed with in the guts of metal as a music, just melodies harmonies and rhythm like all before and after it and I tire of those that try so far to convince otherwise, to build a simple but grandiose metal machine to hide their persons behind. The parts of a music, the melodies, harmonies and rhythm are put together by people and they who listen to it are people too. To understand the true beauty of art in all its horror and grace is to understand them foremost.
Experienceproject Q&A
What can I do? If I leave the phone to ring, I'll spend the next hour or so wondering if it was an important call. Maybe it was the Readers' Digest phoning to tell me I've finally won that huge amount of money they've been writing to me about for years; perhaps even now they're crossing me off the list and moving on to the next name. Or could it be the hospital? Have I just, by callously and unfeelingly failing to answer the phone, left one of my loved ones to perish in the arms of strangers?
Enjoy warm with ketchup or with the chutney of your choice.
Summer surprised us, coming over the Starnbergersee
should pen and ink reveal me,
Oh well, who cares, I am far less fond of this design than all other alt HQ designs (like Arkham City and Arkham Asylum, both of which I have never drawn before either. I totally should.)
A story of love's commitment, of partings and reconciliations, of the courage involved in living on nobody's else's terms, Ghost Light is profoundly moving .
i hear a mournful melody
Of course, there are more than a few people Brownie doesn’t like. Which might give the revelation of the bad guy alittlesuspense, at least. After all…I want the reader to figure it out, but not too soon. In order for this to work well, the characters can’t be the only ones feeling betrayed. For best emotion, I feel the reader needs to feel betrayed as well. Not by the author…but by the character. To understand why the protagonists are hurt, to feel their pain as well.
Today I had a big cheese on my face. Since day one John and I was attached hip to hip and barely are separated. I think at times we don’t know how to act without each other. It feels as something is always missing and we know it is each other. Even our friends know once they see one they see the other. No one expect us to arrive at dinner or an event without the other. For them it is a bit awkward. Today I drove John to the airport than went shopping. You see I have never drove alone in Germany. I have drove many time as the driver with John but never alone. Today I was nervous and excited at the same time. I have made plans already to meet up with a couple of my friends next week. This will be the first time of me meeting up with them alone by not taking the train, and them not having to drive to my city just to visit me. I am so looking forward to it. I would love for John to be with me because we enjoy both friends company but it will also be nice for us girls to catch up.
And the big trial against the terrorist started today. I am swallowed up by the collective feeling about it all: overwhelming stuff to put it mildly. I am sitting glued to the TV, watching me watching it and having all these reactions – and allowing.
Thanksgiving came and I got up at O'dark:30 in the morning to get started!
F: So if you don’t mind me asking, how old are you?
I know, you have heard all the modern psycho-babble about "forgiving" people who hurt you when they have not honestly confessed and put forth honest effort to repent of their sins against you. They say, "It will make YOU feel better."
It is an interview with a neuroscientist, and in it she talks about the best way to stimulate young brains and get them in the best shape for learning later in their lives.
I was 21 and in a band with my brother and a couple of friends. Chris on keyboards and Marc on bass. I had been elected lead singer whilst Shane, my bro, sat happily out off the spotlight on his drums at the rear. We went by the name of Nitecap. Yeah, I know it’s cheesy but hang in there. We had spent several months rehearsing in the local church hall in Winslow. Songs such as Hot Chocolates “Everyone’s a winner” and Roy Orbisons “Pretty Woman” were belted out with gusto. In time, we had enough to play for a straight two hours and it was time to get ourselves out there. The only thing that was missing were stage clothes. We had to look good to impress clients and customers alike. After much deliberation, about ten minutes, it was decided that we should go with the tried and tested white dress shirt and bow tie with black trousers. Well, back in 1988, that was considered “cool” apparently. Anyway, we had the clothes sorted out so all that was left was to get some gigs. Chris took it upon himself to get in contact with a local entertainment agency called Stardust. We duly sent them a demo cassette tape, told them what we were looking for then sat back and waited.
“Somewhere around,” Rayloth repeated, the question showing itself in his voice.
The moral to my story is, be mindful of your teeth and take good care of them. If you are a soda drinker, stop. I was a 2 Dew/day for a decade or so and my mouth is evidence of what can go terribly wrong; a perfect tooth one moment, broken the next.
Every morning you greet me.
I enter the service road from Edison Avenue, one of the area’s larger side streets. Every morning I greet the expressway at a 90′ angle so upon facing it I can see the southward route out of the city to my right and to my left is the path deeper into Metro Manila. That left is the first big turn I make in the series of choices I make each day.
Najib also shrugged off suggestions that Shahrizat’s continued leadership of the wing would hurt Barisan Nasional’s election preparations.
Those of you who haven't joined us for classes -- come on -- join us.
De La Senne Stouterik -- good, Guinness-like
The liquor and malt give it a cloying sweetness, but there's a strong, grating metalic quality to the bourbon, which muscles the beer out of the way. I'm going out on a limb here, but it also seemed like the bourbon was pretty cheap. That seems counterintuitive, given that cheap bourbon probably doesn't make it into barrels (or does it?), but I knows what I tastes.
Hey, when you really think about it, maybe its already too late. The BN-controlled media was closed to any dissenting views, so the dissenters were forced to find alternatives. Technology opened up and flattened the playing field. In fact, as the mainstream media gets further sidelined by changing public behaviour and preference, the online media gets stronger.
I finally found the time to begin. I have started with a loose line drawing, and I think I have captured his boxy nose and his doggy smile. But I can’t decide if I want to go with a detailed colored pencil approach or my usual loose marker/acrylic paint style. I am leaning towards the latter.
Mismatching clothes, giggling uncontrollably, yelling at Penskes, and takin' names since 1985. I blog and write. I love lemurs, music, and TV on DVD, especially Castle. Just a 26 year old girl who's a little too strange to pin down into a few words. Still trying to figure out her future, still trying to figure out herself. Currently in the midst of her quarter-life-crisis yet getting very close to reaching an epiphany. Love to read, love to write, love to write about reading!
Next: my mother has suffered quite a bit through the past months without energy and in and out of the hospital. Finally the decision was made to insert a pacemaker, and it has made all the difference. I am so happy to report that her energy level is up and she is doing much better. This pacemaker thing is really a miracle. Now, if only we could control her blood sugar better, but one thing at a time.
It’s nice to see some tasty looking salad bars, but if these images are any indication, it looks like American kids are still eating a lot of Tator tots. Blec.
Things went a little bit pyriform in March as regards my reading (whole days where I read nothing! nothing at all!! oh, the horror!!!) and, almost, with my writing up the books before the end of April. Anyway, here are the reviews for the things I did read, keeping count on the 52 (x3) book challenge for the year. I hope some sound intriguing enough for you to want to give them a try:
Saina Nehwal will be defending her title, again, in the women’s singles final, after beating Taiwan’s Cheng Shao Chieh, 21-14, 14-21, 21-17. Saina, too, is the two-time defending champion. But this time, the Indian will face a tough match against Wang Yihan (pictured), whom she has never beaten before. Wang has 2-0 lead against Saina. The Chinese defeated her compatriot, Jiang Yanjiao, 21-13, 21-12 in the other semi-final.
In the late 20s, he began to move into musical comedy. He was cast in the 1927 Hammerstein musical Golden Dawn. In 1929, he did Boom Boom for the Shuberts with Jeanette McDonald. He worked in various Shubert shows for three years. Then his friend and colleague Fay Wray went to Hollywood to star in King Kong. Wray persuaded Leach to make the move himself in late 1931, where he signed at Paramount as Cary Grant. That carefully wrought name and persona was invented—fashioned with all the care and diligence of the old vaudevillian the man always was.
Things are not going to improve. They cannot, there is no reason to believe our slow slide into a failed state can be reversed with our current regime, and there is no prospect whatsoever of there being a change to governance based on meritocracy. Anyone who believes otherwise, or that the ANC can mend their ways, is living in LaLa land. They do not have the intellect.
I received this complimentary copy of this book from the publisher specifically for this review. All opinions expressed are my own.
What is Mike’s favorite alcoholic drink?
Rule 7: Track Your Progress...
I started my training on Monday. Early morning running on Monday just seems to start my week off right. I had 6 miles on the plan with four of them supposed to be at marathon pace (MP). I got those done and felt like I could have run more MP miles. Definitely a good sign! The "off season" speed work sessions are already showing their benefits.
Der historische Mose und die Frü hgeschichte Israels 37–63
- my work...for the joy it gives
The spring onions added a nice sweetness to the beans.
It's almost time for Stamp Camp again! This month we will be creating an adorable mix and match note card set with a coordinating box. I used the tutorial created by fellow demonstrator and UStamp designer Betty Traciak for one of the demonstrator challenges issued by Stampin' Up a year or two ago. She did a phenomenal job! But then, she always does. I am trying really hard to use up all of my retired supplies rather than let them collect dust, not only because I am trying to get past my hoarding issues (yes, I do hoard paper and embellishments!) but to clean out in preparation for our move some time this year. I do buy new paper when it comes out if it absolutely screams my name (which so many of them do), but I've promised myself to limit those purchases until I've depleted the 25+ packages of Designer Series Paper that I've purchased over the last few years.
(my mom says she used two cans as one didn't seem to be enough)
To fall for you
Looking down, DJ met the dark brown eyes of Brandon Carroll. Almond shaped and nearly the same color, Brandon stood a good six feet tall. DJ still seemed to tower over him.
I can't help but to fall in love really hard.
Then, worn out from the dancing,
$60 twinkies
For my second project... and my personal favorite, I used the same wire wrapping technique and created a very elegant card. I adore the colors in this one... This is featured in the book titled Wired Cards and Embellishments. This book also can be found on the website here.
Azerbaijani news agencies are reporting that the quake caused cracks in the buildings and damaged houses in the epicenter and surrounding areas. No casualties are reported. No damage was reported from Georgia’s Dedoplistskaro district (http://www.civil.ge/eng/article.php?id=24732)”.
But I'm almost there...
The artillery, the silent cannons bright as gold, drawn along, rumble
My sister was walking my nephew home from school, when he turned to her and said "oh Mum, this boy started in my class today & he's got a really funny name"
Thanks to everyone that helped!!
Each day you sit down with your Journal and your jar… Pick a random prompt out of the Jar, and then journal about that topic! This can be made for children or adults. I mean come on we aren’t getting any younger, who know how much longer we will remember some of these things. So write them down now, so they can be shared with family later.
“Aren’t you rather early, Eques?” the professor asked.
He was standing before an unattended grave. He was alone in a cemetery which sat upon a knoll overlooking the wooden post that marked the city limits of his hometown. He knelt before the grave and gazed upon the lettering etched into the marble headstone: Edward Nolan - Jan.12,1980-Dec.29, 1997.
Plaza Indonesia extension Level 5
4) I hate going to the mall, but my husband loves it.
By the time you have 50 nesties cut out you do know how to do it,
So, woncha take a couple of minutes to try out the Piley Challenge? 10 multiple choice questions, EVERY answer has appeared in a blog post at one time or another, so lets see who the stalkers are out there!! If anyone gets 80% correct or over I'll stick the names in a hat and award a prize!! No idea what it'll be though!
I made this "Roll a Word" activity for Punkin, though we didn't use a dice, so I guess it is technically "Pick a Word?" Anyway, she picked a rain cloud card first (consonants), an umbrella card second (vowels), and a rainbow card last (more consonants). Then, she recorded her "picks" on the correct picture, wrote the "word," and then decided if it was a real word or not.
What do you live by in life? (Your motto, a quote, a verse etc.) Make it your own. Whether its life, love, or just recipes. Make everything your own.
The one friend
They turned off the road, and followed the snow-laden path until they passed through the narrow gap in the hill. They then crept through the woods quietly until they came to the wooden bridge in the forest that spanned the babbling, mostly frozen brook.
#90: Met new people at salsa party. These salsa dancin’ folks keep showing up in my blog, and that’s because there are so dang many of them, and they’re all such great people! I met a handful more at their most recent gathering, and befriended someone who is just as big a Queen and classic rock fan as I am. In fact, he was a roadie for Journey when he was a youngin’. JEALOUS MUCH.
And it was AH-MAZING. Loved it. Like couldn't put it down loved it. It's a six book series, and I just started the second one last night on my kindle. By the way, the kindle goes on my top ten list of best inventions EVER. Along with hairspray, hot glue & sharpie pens. ;o)
A long time ago I used to sing “Make new friends, but keep the old. One is silver and the other gold.” in rounds with my Girl Scout troupe and it really stuck with me.
Seat covers aren’t the only thing bothering Billy Jack Jurkis about public restrooms. According to the congressman, stall doors swinging inward make exiting very difficult for overweight individuals like himself. “Hell, I can barely get out of that damned death trap pulling the door towards me. Even as I’m scootin’ backwards, there ain’t no room! Last month, my wife fell back into the toilet at the Hess station as she was trying to get out. Helluva mess that was. Had to throw away her clothes afterwards.” According to OSHA, the doors swing inward as to not strike other restroom users that might be close to the stall’s exterior. Jurkis argues that nobody should be standing that close to somebody else moving their bowels even if there is a door between them. “Ain’t nobody need to be sniffing around the door jamb while I’m passin’ a T-Bone, I can tell you that much. What we need is two-way hinge like in the old saloons. I should be able to fling a door open when I want out, goddamit. That’ll be next. First thing’s first and that’s getting anti-septic toilet seat covers that can stop a .22 from ten feet away. Now that will be something I can sit on and feel good about, goddamit.”
“My feet are at Moorgate, and my heart
Mommy Tyme will be sending one lucky winner a Green Tea Sea Salt Scrub Bar- this is an extra hard, extra long lasting, low lather bar made with aloe oil, aloe gel, mineral sea salts, coconut oil, jojoba oil, glycerin, avocado and cucumber base and more... Skin loving ingredients!
I went home and wondered when or if I'll ever get to the point where everyone thinks my chapter is good to go. Don't get me wrong, I love the feedback. It's invaluable.
A bittersweet post this is to write! To meet my fiscal goals I’ve been going Upstate only twice a month. I’m trying to pay my car off early so I can afford the pay cut I face when I move there. I miss my King. I miss my poochies. Sacrifice is necessary, but being a saint really sucks when I lay on my empty bed at my mom’s house. I will smile through my tears.
13. 1 Stallion Trail… Asked: $2,499,995. Sold $1,150,000. Started 9/2001
But drunk on cheap vermouth cider.
Why do we have fireworks again?
That's it for today. A long post and then some.
Every year my church participates in a 21-day fast. This year I decided to participate, it began on Jan 10th and goes thru Jan 31st. So my choice of fasting was to try the Daniel Fast.
These figures would indeed be worrying if they had any relevance at all. When Palestinians are asked about Al Qaeda or Osama Bin Laden, words are, to a large extent, being put in their mouths. It's not like they are spontaneously demonstrating in favor of Al Qaeda. Osama is, was, a reality far removed from theirs, almost a construct. Saying that they had confidence in him is irrelevant insofar as most Palestinians, an overwhelming majority, had no chance of translating that declared confidence into a concrete support for Bin Laden. Even more importantly, those who did have that possibility --the Palestinians who managed to travel and settle abroad-- did not enroll in Al Qaeda. Indeed, Stanford's Martha Crenshaw, one of the foremost scholars in terrorism studies, has noted that there are "almost no Palestinians in al Qaeda and no proven links with Hamas or the other Palestinian groups that use terrorism against Israel." So when the Palestinians are asked if they have confidence in Bin Laden, their answer must be seen as a manifesto against the West that has so often betrayed them. Essentially they are telling the Western pollster "I'll say what I know that will irk you." If they meant it, they would have joined Al Qaeda in large numbers.
Today I am sharing my last guest post for The Shabby Tea Room. My goodness how quickly the last month has gone by! I have had a wonderful time. Thanks so much to Debbie and crew for making me feel so welcome! You ladies have been such a blessing to me! So now on to this week's challenge...
And while everyone agrees that Cas is doing an excellent job of banishing ghosts, it’s something that’s left him friendless and fatherless. But all of this is about to change in Thunder Bay. Cas is about to find an unlikely group of friends including a Prom Queen and a geeky wizard. He’ll witness terrifying ghosts, at least one murder, and the very being that killed his father. And not everyone will make it out alive…
Fry at 350 for about 3-5 minutes, or until deep golden brown.
On the absent face that fixed you;
Please share, if you are willing.
Last Friday I had the great pleasure of judging at the final round of the International Championship of High School A Cappella. The show, produced by Varsity Vocals at the Hunter College Kaye Playhouse, featured ten of the nation’s best high school a cappella groups. As a high school teacher I thoroughly enjoyed the opportunity to witness firsthand the great work that is happening at schools around the country. These young singers are simply inspiring.
Some of the most environmentally conscious people I know are livestock farmers and ranchers.
15. Backwards
Poor Killian. For a whole day all he wanted to do was eat and eat. I just figured he was trying to up my milk supply or he was going through another growth spurt. (I’m still not sure how long he is, but the little guy is now 10 lbs! Sometimes, I hold him and think to myself “My God, how do women give birth to babies this big??” God never answers me but I imagine Him giving me a high five when those mothers aren’t looking.) The next day, all he wanted to do was sleep. After I woke him up for a couple of feedings, I noticed he was feeling pretty hot even though he was just in footie jammies. Alaskan babies are not supposed to be that hot. When I took his temp, he was 99.4… Not cool. His stuffy nose even got stuffier and he started coughing from all of the mucous reaking havoc on his throat.
Now Little Wellies has taken the combo of costume meets outfit- here she has created these adorbale outfits to resemble disney princesses...to just wear to town or a playdate. So many choices!! I think Belle is my favorite.
My application here is not the best, so please bear with me! For lips I used Etude House Dear Darling Tint in 03 Orange Red, NYX Orange Lipliner and Milani Colour Perfect Lipstick in Orange-Gina. The cheeks were Benefit Coralista mixed with MAC Springsheen and NARS Albatross to highlight. I used MAC Sable and Amber Lights on my eyeballs. :3
4) St. Louis Cardinals (19-11) K. Lohse (4-1, 2.11) @ Arizona Diamondbacks (14-17) W. Miley (3-0, 2.33), 8:40 pm
And then of course He achieved stardom according to Philippians 2 v 5 – 11 the Bible tells us because of the sacrifice that he made on a good Friday like a day like today, because of the sacrifice He made, He ended up with a name that is above every other names.
1 boiled egg
The label doesnt promote confidence, like some badly design cheap souvenir it conjures up memories of an episode of Friends I'd rather forget.
The interesting thing about the use of "Forward" by Barack Obama's reelection efforts is the historical way that one-word slogan has been used, specifically in connection to socialist and communist publications.
Now my compassion slowly drowns
I black matted all the papers to really make it pop, and to let each pink paper really stand out from each other. TO also let the papers meld better i inked all the edges with black chalk ink, so fun little tip: always ink your edges to make then appear softer and it gives the entire overall look a much more relaxed feel. I made the little bow, and used my stamps to create the cute little flowers!!
A voice came from a darkened corner. “That was impressive, Brother.”
On our way to the hospital, we made the calls to the doctor and to Nana. Thankfully, the doctor was already at the hospital. Johnny pulled up to the front door and I stumbled out of the car into the lobby. I quickly found the receptionist, told her I was in labor, then promptly got on all fours and started vomiting in her trashcan. I'm so charming...wouldn't you want to invite me to one of your parties? What a horrible way to greet someone! To my relief, a wheel chair appeared out of thin air along with my husband and children. I got a quick ride down the hallway to room 11. As my family waited out in the hall for Nana to arrive, inside the room there was a flurry of activity as clothes went flying, machines were adjusted, and nurses fluttered around the room getting everything ready. Someone checked my progress and announced "You're about 9 cm along. Your water hasn't broken yet, that's the only thing keeping her in there." I was thinking "Well, let's break that bitch and get this party started. I'm ready to go in coach!" Instead I think I said something along the lines of "oooooohhhhhhhughghgh."
Probably one of the greatest illusions of social media is that we are more connected than ever. Wrong, at least in my own meandering experience. Sure, the ability and the availability to be connected is always there but that is not the issue. The issue is, are we using these available functions? Sad to say, knowing that we have these set of tools for communication within our reach and with a touch of finger - we tend to brush it off every, single, day.
motherfucker of cuntshitting days sent from Satan himself. This, however, is a reality I have come to accept. I accept that it is incredibly, insufferably sad that I have terminal cancer. I accept that it is equally devastating for those I love as it is for me. I accept that my world has been forced to change in ways that I’d rather it hadn’t. I accept that the treatment to prolong my life won’t always make me feel especially well, but that it’s what must be done. I accept that I probably won’t be able to make it to another Glastonbury; I accept that I probably won’t reach my 40th birthday; and I accept that you’ll probably be terribly sad when I have gone because I’m just so damn ruddy awesome.
...Other examples of possible platform projects are the former railroad space adjoining the Staten Island Ferry that could be used to connect the St. George neighborhood to its waterfront, and the 36th Street Rail Yards on the southern edge of the Green Wood Cemetery in Brooklyn. Building on a platform over it could result in substantial new units of housing.
For the reader this actually means the page becomes dominated by the patterns of these 'birds' in much the same way as the decorative patterns of William Morris. There is an easy visual pleasure to be enjoyed from flicking through the pages of this book that comes not just from the aesthetic beauty of Devernay's illustrations but also from the movement she has been able to 'orchestrate.' Your eye moves about the page just as I'm sure she intended it to and though the book may be short and its lasting impact limited it is a fascinating combination of book, art, narrative and movement.
4. Cover me - Björk & Me
Leaves take all kinds of strange shapes, as if to invite us to examine them. Star-shaped, heart-shaped, spear-shaped, arrow-shaped, fretted, fringed, cleft, furrowed, serrated, sinuated; in whorls, in tufts, in spires, in wreaths endlessly expressive, deceptive, fantastic, never the same from footstalk to blossom; they seem perpetually to tempt our watchfulness, and take delight in outstripping our wonder.—John Ruskin
Of course, South Karana was just steps away. However, the most lucrative spot for us, the Aviak tree house, was heavily camped when we got on. But as the night dragged on and we faced another stretch of gnolls after three of us had already hit 19, we decided to head into South Karana to see if we could speed things up a bit. We were also all encumbered with drops, so the centaur camp and its vendor was on our list of destinations.
Couldn't find out more than this about Barry Benson: He was P.J. Proby's hairdresser. Well, if that was enough qualification to record four singles for Parlophone and one for Page One, why not... Both sides of this Larry Page production contain songs made popular by The Troggs. ( The a-side was "Cousin Jane".) +++
Half Back Pearls: Stampin' Up! Pretties Kit
Let's challenge ourselves to really be thankful for the jobs that we have, no matter what they are. If you have your dream job, don't take it for granted. If you are working towards your dream job or in school and have a part time job, be thankful for that extra income. Maybe your job is really not where you want to be, but you need the money...then find something about it to be grateful for, whether it's the income, your coworkers or the hours. If you really just can't find anything to be happy about with your job, then you definitely need to pray about it and ask God to lead you where you need to be and give you a positive attitude in the meantime.
I do it every year.
This wasn't a hit, but interest in the track has if anything increased over the years. Mark Radcliffe regularly used the song as a sound bed on his evening show on Radio One, and it continues to pick up club play in a lot of places. I suspect that will continue for some time to come.
"Must get milk, petrol light will be on soon, must respond to that email, can't forget to call and cancel that appointment, must make hair appointment, kids sheets need changing this weekend, Immy needs pants as the others are too small, must get to dance shop for Immy's tap shoes, wonder if there is meat in the freezer for dinner..."
To Avery and her parents: You three are in my prayers. Since I have heard about your story I have took a lot of consideration in my life and future. I know I’m not the only person Avery has inspired. Thank you so much for sharing your story.
On the 17th January 2012 the European Court decided that Qatada could not be extradited as it would breach his right to a fair trial. While the British Government sought assurances regarding this issue from Jordon, Qatada was released on bail. Having received these assurances, the Home Secretary decided to have Qatada arrested and deported on the Tuesday 17th April in the belief that this date was outside of the 3 month appeal limit on the European Courts decision.
~The information on this blog should not be used to diagnose, treat, or cure any disease or cancer. The information is given to you as a ‘natural’ remedy, and it is by your own choice and free will to use this information and act upon it.~
His latest endeavor was so kind and thoughtful. I thought we were just re-doing a part of our house but he said it was for me. To have a nice space.....
This had been the ritual for about six months, until one Saturday my curiousity got the better of me. I waited until I saw Jack appear, before I took my lunch break and wandered across the square.
We’ve all seen it – or worse, stepped in it – dog waste left behind by irresponsible dog owners. The dog cannot be blamed for it, for it is the human who is responsible for what the dog does, where he does it, and whether it is left behind as a steaming testament to rudeness and irresponsibility. In 2010, according to Consumer Reports, dog poop was listed at #6 on a list of everyday annoyances.
He went on to explain his concerns. He shared how he felt like I didn’t listen to him. I ignored him during conversations and focused on my issues and concerns. He was tired of it and decided to just clam up. And not only was I selfish, I was totally dependent on him for emotional support, and that was a heavy cross to bear. This only let the frustration fester into anger and resentment. Apparently it had gone on so long that he was over me and our marriage. I didn’t realize how self-absorbed I’d become. And it was true: I was too dependent on him. A few months after I had gotten pregnant I let my relationship with God declined into gripes and thankless prayers.
A lot happened in the last few months of 2011. There were weddings, vacations, hockey games, new friends, parties, etc. All things that are blog worthy. But, there's no point in looking back I guess. We've entered a new year with new things happening. There are a number of significant changes coming in 2012 and I'm excited. And nervous. And excited. But that's what change is supposed to be, right?
And as my first artistic protest project, I’d like to offer up this series of horrible pictures. If you can guess what any of them are, I’ll know you’ve read this far. And that in the end is something.
promising sleep and a pleasant visage.
I was on my way into a cafeteria yesterday clutching a file with the next chapter to edit, and who should walk by but my friend Lol.
I'm sure most of you have heard that the National Wildlife Federation, promoters of the backyard habitat certification program, have partnered with Scotts of Miracle Gro and fertilizer and insecticide fame. Two programs are key: increasing wild songbirds (by buying Scotts birdseed) and getting kids back out into nature (where they can absorb all kinds of Scotts products). I apologize for my snark. Go read Tallamy's Bringing Nature Home, and Louv's Last Child in the Woods. That's all you need to light a fire under you.
What are the possibilities of a democratic Xinjiang within an authoritarian China? Is it plausible?
Wolf shivered as a towel was thrown around her and said, “I beg your pardon. I am not responsible for the rain. If you recall a very good song, titled, ‘I’m no stranger to the rain’, you should be ashamed of yourselves. After all, the singer drank himself to death over the rain. That was a tragic ending. So, excuse me, but I need a ride to the sports bar. Can I hitch a ride on the fire truck?”
Center a rack in the oven and preheat the oven to 350º F. Butter a 9- to 10-inch (12 cup) Bundt pan, dust the inside with flour and tap out the excess. If your pan is not nonstick, dust the interior of the pan with flour, then tap out the excess. (If you've got a silicone Bundt pan, there's no need to butter or flour it.) Don't place the pan on a baking sheet - you want the oven's heat to circulate through the Bundt's inner tube.
*If you still feel that you need to eat animal flesh and drink the milk of another species in order to survive in life, then at least consider local farmers that keep small amounts of animals in pastures and natural settings. And take the time to educate yourself about what you are feeding yourself and your families. There are resources under my Resources and Links page (Eating Animals, Food Inc., Forks over Knives).
I don’t usually post on Sundays. I haven’t posted in nearly a week. It’s been a crazy several days…crazy good with an old pal visiting (we had a lovely time), and crazy-crazy in that I got a new job.
Police fired tear gas directly at the crowd. They also manoeuvred their firing pattern to box in the participants rather than allowing them to disperse quickly. This is not action to disperse, but is instead designed to attack, a crowd. When items were thrown at the police, the police stooped to return like for like.
The one thing that teaching science imbues you with is a high regard for the difference between a fact and an opinion.
I left to pick up g-son early today to stop by Aldi and Sav Mor to get baking supplies. When I arrived to get g-son he was having a fun time playing with his friends so I waited for all the other parents and grandparents to get there so the kids could all leave together.
Be sure to visit the Class Act Insider blog to see the beautiful projects from the rest of the design team. You'll also find details on how you can join in the challenge and maybe even with this month's prize.
Step 4: Press the bottom of the folded circle with the hot glue onto the chinese lantern.
born: unknown (Hanover County, VA)
Did I reorganize the downstairs closet- nope
As the National Autistic Society explains:
Here are the few notes I made on Psalm 1 for this week’s lesson. They are somewhat hurried, but I think you will find some usefulness in them. There are a few quotes from various authors and commentaries. You can also download the MSWord version at box.net: Psalm 1. Be blessed. [PS--There are a couple of random notes in the midst. They cover Revelation 1:7-8 and have little to do with the Psalm. I wrote them for a friend of mine, but you can borrow them too.] As with most of my notes, these ones are very loosely connected and mostly random. I’m sort of thinking as I go.
After four books in the Song of Ice and Fire series, it finally occurred to me that I didn't really care about anyone in those books. They were very depressing. I've dismissed them. They're well written and exciting, but they're not wholesome. Whatever it really was that I was missing in George R.R. Martin's series, I've found in here. Lawhead's characters display real and true love for each other. I'll have no worries about Lawhead's Pendragon series sitting on the shelf when my kids poke around them with curiosity. In fact, I look forward to that day (this wasn't the case with Martin's books).
12. Borracho
Thanks for looking; and have a happy and healthy 2012!
I really liked how Liara T’Soni has developed over three games. Gone are those days when she was the shy, awkward doctor with a passion and background in archaeology. She’s now the more confident and assertive woman who gets things done at all costs even though at times it puts herself in more danger as a result. The Turian Garrus Vakarian is probably the few squad members in the game who doesn’t change all that much. Garrus is a fan favorite for a reason. His dry humor, loyalty, and ability to kick ass in a fight makes him really likeable. And Garrus has a really sexy voice! Male and female gamers alike can’t help but be charmed by the former C-Sec officer.
The Development Events Coordinator is responsible for the design, coordination, and implementation of all off-site cultivation and stewardship events for Museum donors, as directed by the Deputy Director, Advancement, and Assistant Director, Individual Giving. Additionally, the Development Events Coordinator is responsible for the coordination and logistics of select internal Museum events such as board meetings and donor receptions. The coordinator will work with the Senior Manager, Events and Assistant Director, Individual Giving on two annual fundraising events: Gala in the Garden and K.A.M.P. (kids art museum project) and may be asked to assist with an annual membership dinner. Other responsibilities include: managing gift acknowledgements/receipts; monitoring budgets/expenses; and preparing mailings and invitation lists.
Ingredients for Friand
2 men staff the place and they've always given me great service. They don't really speak English, so have patience.
Friendships to lighten your being
‘The contradiction was not a new piece, it was the absence of a piece’ one mused ‘And I cannot remember which one. Maybe it have never existed.’
What one doesn't realize going into a tome like this is that you can't actually begin the cooking process for about a week after you purchase the book. There is a lot of background on the kinds of wines and butters and cookware you'll need before you even begin. Then there is a lot of shopping.
Does anyone have experience of French or German law and can offer an insight into how this approach to photographic subsistence and infringement applies in practice? I noted a recent case in France (reported by TechDirt and the BJP) where the Le Corbusier Foundation appears to have successfully sued Getty for stocking some photographs of Le Corbusier chairs without its permission. Any information on that case would be of particular interest.
-Cena goes for the AA but Brock fights out and hits 2 german suplexes.
If I can not have a private conversation with my attendant… you are too close to me.
Consider for a moment our motivations in life. As people we are often self-justifying, self-gratifying, self-advancing. These are parts of who we are. As the saying goes we ‘Always look out for number 1 – us.’ I recall my aunt Gerri once telling me there’s no genuine altruism in the world; anyone who does anything is always doing it for some reason, and she’s right. We are motivated by the self.
she woke up with a fever and had to miss her first day - poor girl!
Noble and Harrison (and Lauren) got lots of trains for Christmas. The whole family has been having fun making new configurations of tracks.
Dan Baran: aka Fretslayer:
Professor Hasnain, who was not involved in drafting the IPCC report, said that he noticed some of the mistakes when he first read the relevant section in 2008.
ANGELA: Yeah.
move and should, use the WD-40. If it shouldn’t move and does, use the
Nick Griffin MEP and the British National Party will be campaigning to make St Georges day a national holiday straight after this years elections!
named Tarrant County Chief Medical Examiner Dr. Nizam Peerwani to both three-member panels, making some commission members wonder if Bradley sees Peerwani as an ally.
About the artist
I had things to do. But. The propane ran out! I called the Propane Man. He would bring us some. Certainly. So. The dishes sat there, me gladly reasoning that I shouldn't wash them in cold water. The laundry came to a dead halt, those towels couldn't go in the dryer with no propane to run it! And it was cloudy and threatening to rain, not hanging-out weather...so no more laundry went into that washer. I worked out and couldn't shower. I couldn't bake those butterfly cut-outs. Poor Camille, she got the bath that never got warm...I sort of had an inkling we must have run out when the water stayed just a little cooler than luke-warm...but that poor child insisted on sitting there and playing with her mermaid Barbies for a while anyway. When she got out, she had to cuddle with me under a blanket for a while, poor us!
“Very cool. How do you decide who is worthy of a Livvy Moore portrait?”
"Nice try, moms, we're not done with Halloween yet and we'll thank you not to ruin our sugar high with your 'Let's untangle all the twinkle lights' bullshit."
3. Final edits. I will leave the book to stew when it is ‘done’, give it out to my readers, then come back to it myself and make changes to the hardcopy (or PDF in Notability), then read my readers’ comments and take them into account. Then comes an extensive re-write and more minor edits, and this can go on for a while.
PS Last night (Saturday,) Lisa did an original homemade Irish potato/leek clam chowder for dinner and baked her signature apple pie.
In the end, like with so many other instances of less-than-true-informed-consent, it worked out: everyone is fine, and lovely. Little one is gorgeous, Mama is happy, and Papa is, well, a proud Papa. My preceptor ended with a healthy mama and baby, and no fear of litigation or a peer review from her collaborating physicians. I, though, ended with a family that still haunts me; I am grateful for the beauty of their birth story - beyond all that was done to them, they remained strong - yet am saddened for the lack of informed consent that took place (and that, truly, exists in most facilities regarding pregnancy, labor, delivery - and inductions in particular).
Deb Fischer, a state senator and a mom who works part-time on her family farm seems made to order as one of Palin's Mama Grizzlies.
This is sponsored content from BlogHer and LG Text Ed
“Adornment, what a science! Beauty, what a weapon! Modesty, what elegance!”
In the spirit of coming together and to put this behind us, I’d like to reach out to Emily Cier, whose extraordinary talents I admire, and invite her to collaborate with me on a new free project that we would feature on the Moda Bake Shop in the coming months. Please let me know, Emily. I have no hard feelings, and I think you and I as artists share a lot more than anything here that may have divided us. I was thinking we might call the project something like “Reconciliation” or perhaps as a nod to you, “Scrappy Reconciliation”?
“We are disappointed the Club is now the subject of an investigation by the SPL regarding the behaviour of some fans at the match against Kilmarnock on Saturday.
bottom of this post.) Because, in the time that I’ve been busily recovering and returning to some kind of normal, the medical (and charitable) worlds have been busily advancing, making the 2G of three years ago look rather laughable in comparison to the 4S of today.
Unfortunately, I am congenitally missing 5 adult teeth (It is a condition called Hypodontia). This basically means that 5 of my teeth never developed. As a result, I never lost 5 of my baby teeth. Since no adult teeth formed under these teeth, the baby teeth simply never fell out. The good news is that 4 of these teeth are toward the back of my mouth. Upon meeting me, you would never notice these teeth (they are my 2nd premolars). To remedy my dental problems, I need to have my retained baby teeth pulled (I had 4 of the teeth removed last month), wear braces for two years, and replace my missing teeth with dental implants. I may also need veneers to widen my lateral incisors.
On 17 August 1996, the victim’s body was discovered by police and his family in his home in San Antonio, Texas. He had been shot twice in the head and stabbed in the shoulder. The bullet fragments at the scene were consistent with having been fired from a pistol owned by the victim. This pistol, and the victim’s red Harley Davidson motorcycle, were missing from his home.
Even as the hammer strokes of guilt,
The richness of a summer we never really saw. Not properly. Not in one another's imagined arms.
Almost any steak will work. Get what is on sale! I used Eye of Round steak, it was on mark down that day.
The average Japanese individual prior to World War II was not a warmongering sadist. Yet, Japan murdered and slaughtered its way across South East Asia in an orgy of killing that included the systematic murder of 12 million Chinese civilians; most killed by sword, shovel, and bayonet.
Now that you realize how important the first impression really is when it comes to building a cadre of brand advocates – customer loyalty that causes individuals to favor you over lower priced competitors, give you the benefit of the doubt and who will, without doubt, be your best source of word of mouth referrals – now that you understand the importance of the first impression that your business makes, it’s time for you to evaluate the first impressions your business is making, across all customer touch points.
I still have plenty of juice left from yesterday so I am prepared for the day. (I know that's not ideal, that juice should be drunk right away, but I can't bear to waste it!) Have a wonderful Sunday, and don't forget to shine the Light for Dave! (You know I'm going to check up on you tomorrow, right?!)
However, what he failed to mention was that the majority of disability benefits are given to those who have been unable to make adequate national insurance contributions. Byrne referred only to the contributory form of ESA, failing to acknowledge that of the 662,000 people claiming ESA, 339,000 (51%) claim the non-contributory form, because they have not made adequate national insurance contributions. Then there are the 3 million people claiming DLA, conditional neither on state contributions nor means tested.
Whoa. I mean really. I believed her, I mean “kinda” believed her – in that “yeah, sure, whatever you say” kind of way.
Hail to the King from Argos and Sinope–Rejoice! You are praised!
it is one of my personal favorite flavor combos, so i decided to do my own take on minty lemon with my look for today..
If anyone knows the owner of the house, please let him know he has been featured here.
(7) full use of scientific procedures.
Click here to make a comment and watch a video interview Dr. Mercola conducted on taking action NOW to protect vaccine choices.
sometimes, things at work can be a little annoying.
Amid an intensifying US-led campaign against Iran’s nuclear program, Ahmadinejad went to stress that Iranian nation is prepared to face the enemy resolutely.
To think theologically is to go beyond the popular question, “What would Jesus do?” Thinking theologically requires us to ask, “What is God asking me to do in this situation?” The challenge is that the disciple is not looking for spiritual principles that might apply to modern circumstance; she is looking for a specific revelation from God that directs her actions in her present situation.
Though the previous week
Of course, 5 months have FLOWN by. Hell, this last year has flown by. So, maybe if it continues to fly past… I’ll blink and wake up thin. One can only hope.
Fisher Communications is an equal opportunity employer. For more details please visit our career page at www.fsci.com.
Put 2 table spoons of vegetable oil into hot wok. Sautéed garlic until fragrant. Put in the kuih tiaw, light soya sauce, dark soya sauce, salt to taste and sugar.(You can actually mix the soya sauces with sugar and salt, so that it will be easier to add in when frying the kuih tiaw). Add eggs and fry for a while. Put in the bean sprout. Don’t fry the bean sprout too long, so that it will still remain crunchy.
Dinner - Check the menu plan to see what prep work needs to be done for dinner that evening. I check the menu plan for lunch too at that time.
The little girl goes to the garage and says, "Dad, may I take Belle for a walk around the block? I asked Mom, but she said the dog was in heat, and to come to you."
11AM SCOTT DAIGRE TOMATOMANIA!
Breathe deep.
BEWARE: Hop*A*Potamus will charge if provoked! Hop*A*Potamus is not for the foolish or the faint of heart."
Add flour and cream, alternating between the two.
Really? I didn't think the questions were annoying. That was just the first video segment. They asked me more questions and there will be more segments in the future. It was really fun doing the interview and I enjoyed talking to both Susan and Janice at BlogHer.
Loins suitably girded, it was time to get some culture in, with a visit to Michaelsberg, and the brewing museum, by way of the Bamberger Dom. If you're interested in such things, the Cathedral is an impressive Romanesque structure, built between 1002 and 1012, featuring things like the tomb of the Holy Roman Emperor, Henry II, the tomb of Pope Clement - the only pope to be buried in Germany (or outside of Italy or France for that matter) - the much photographed and apparently mysterious Bamberg Reiter, relics and all sorts of ecclesiastical goodies.
Nowadays, of course, I am learning about the modern things, and still I am helping the darker people in the family. My brother you know is a bit dark, and his daughter also (not like my family). So, for her 12th birthday, I am getting her Fairever cream. Why, means, we all want her to become doctor (we are not having doctor in our family, such a shame). And I saw on TV, this story. One number innocent school girl, she is very troubled on behalf of villagers because there is no hospital for them. She thinks, I will become doctor and save the lives. But what to do, she is dark, so she cannot study well (I think you will also be empathising this situation.) But soon, she finds Fairever cream. Then itself her IQ is doubling, and she is getting admission in medical school. She returns to village as doctor. The villagers are all dark and they are all thinking like “Shabbah! If she is so fair, how good doctor she must be!” Best part about this ad is in ending, a little brown village girl finds the Fairever tube. See how beautifully it is conveyed. Like this only India will progress.
Mrs. Arnold Reeli-Bassackwards: It was her idea (looks at Mr. Bassackwards). Her dream was to be a father. But I didn’t mind supporting her in that. Part of being married, you know, is the happiness of your spouse. And I loved my mother. She was a saint. No shame in being a mother.
18. No. 18 In C 2:25
Gear: club (str +1d4), bone spear (strength +1d6), blowgun (1d6 damage).
Here in Akita we have beautiful sceneries and unique food and craft cultures! We welcome you all with these smiles! Please come!
Eating cake and drinking punch just keeps getting more enjoyable.
Here’s how Chris Rollman, alumni and current facilitator, describes it:
“I don’t need medication. This is a temporary problem, caused by something stupid that I’m missing somehow. Medicine isn’t going to actually help me deal with whatever is wrong, it’s just going to cover up the temporary problem with a bandaid that I’d have to wear permanently.”
Don’t like gingers
Due to the nature of opiates, i.e., the way in which opioid receptors bind to the brain’s receptors responsible for feelings of contentment and well-being, prolonged opiate use compromises the brain’s ability to produce endorphins organically. Thus, an integral component of opiate addiction is physical and neurological in nature; science has proven that an opiate addict’s brain reflects differently when scanned and compared to a non-opiate user’s brain
we’re meant to feel faceless,
Now, if only the words "chocolate" and "candy" could be linked to "oh thanks, I've had enough". That doesn't look like it's going to happen any time soon, unfortunately.
power, I though, an actuality
Would you be interested in going to Las Cruces?
People in work talked about the bomb scare today. Nothing too unusual. Not a safe downtown area, blah blah blah. I was encouraged to be careful.
estimated 5 to 10 mph.
I have a hard time believing that we are at the one year mark since Max's kidney transplant. I still have to remind myself of the rollercoaster ride that we were on just a short year ago. Believe it or not, I barely remember life before July 8, 2010. The dialysis and endless meds seem like a lifetime ago. Fighting to keep Max alive was what got us out of bed every day. When I look back on some of my past blog posts, I have a hard time believing that that was me writing those words. I feel like I am looking into someone else's life and can't believe what that family has gone through to get their little boy to where he is today. Then I realize that that was our life. All of the surgeries, hospital stays and visits, dialysis treatments, tests, therapy sessions, blood draws, the sleepless nights and all of the tears- we lived that. Not only did we live it, but we survived it, and I am so proud of who we have become because of the journey that we chose to live. It was a journey of struggle and heartache, but it was also a journey of determination and love for one little boy. A little boy who has taught us more in his three years of life than we have learned in our 28-30 years of life.
“He who has a why to live can bear almost any how.” - Friedrich Nietzsche
from a distance faraway
Chinwo Nnenda, better known
How do you know if you need more water? If you are thirsty, your body is dehydrated. We actually need water long before we feel thirsty. Other symptoms of mild dehydration can include constipation, chronic pain in joints and muscles, headaches, low energy, and lower back pain.
Continue to mix on slow for another 60 seconds.
Similarly, "plot" cannot be the determining factor, if only by Scipio's own reasoning, where he claims that Flash uses "sci-fi elements" but is not determined by them. Scipio does not cite compelling evidence as to why, say, Superman is defined by such elements, and I believe that at differing periods, Superman's feature could be just as light on "sci-fi elements" as Flash's.
Haven’t had enough yet? Well, you can catch Hottie the following night at Burlesque & Cabaret Behind The Pink Door
Yet there’s something I see in my mind’s eye that is unmatched by the photos, and I’m still not sure what it is. So I’ll keep trying, keep practicing… As long as the dogs are having fun, it’s all good.
Cher – Mask
Sending three postcards costs about a dollar.
“The newly revised dress code, at work.”
I look at several rescues and adoption places on Facebook and Twitter. And it saddens me to see how some of these beautiful animals are treated. Some dogs are used for hunting and kept outside all of the time. Never socialized with humans much less other animals. Some are just neglected because a person can’t afford to care for them any more and some are just left behind when their master passes from this world. In any case, the rescues are doing a tremendous service for them, for the most part.
So, to recap, here are the rules I broke:
L - Tuna and Cabbage Salad
5. Love this eighties classic.
People makes lists & resolutions all the time. I make lists all the time. But i never really complete them. Should i now make another one? Well, doesn’t hurt, i guess. Here’s my bucket list:
thing in common, the fact that they are beautiful regardless
In the databases developed by the Agricultural Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, white peony root (from both Paeonia albaflora and subspecies Paeonia albaflora trichocarpa) has been shown to have chemical properties that restore the normal functioning of the digestive system; act as a laxative; relieve pain; reduce or stop spasms or seizures; lower blood pressure by dilating arteries; and improve the nutrition of blood.
1/2 pound fresh pork fat, cut into 1-inch pieces, chilled
Level 3: Ignores 12% of monster’s DEF.
6- The Arecibo Observatory radio telescope Arecibo Puerto Rico.
~ Starting to "Army" crawl
I will now tell you about Bill Ingraham him and two of the stamper boys joined the Sesesh army and was gone some time and their Capt give a false alarm one day & Bill fainted dead enough & they had like not to have brought him too his capt sent him home the two stamper boys got sick and they come back
Come enjoy a fabulous night of FREE makeup and manicures with an open bar and other great gifts!
But...eh, the princess, while nice enough, was mostly "stock cute orphan" mixed with "stock precocious girl" and I was never able to connect with her or even care about her. The mad king was more the pathetic king and I couldn't care less about the missing queen. Actually, I kind of hated her and I don't even know why considering I never even got to meet her.
is a work I relished re-reading. Istrati, like many supporters of communism, traveled to the newly formed USSR. Ever peripatetic, he traveled far beyond Moscow, confirming with his own eyes the rumors that others had incredulously dismissed. Among the first of several authors (later to include George Orwell, Arthur Koestler, Victor Serge and Istrati’s close friend Nikos Kazantzakis) to warn of the horrors unfolding under Stalin, Istrati paid dearly for these truths. Accused of betraying the revolution, he was denounced ferociously by many who had been his ardent supporters. Rejected by both left and right, broken and disheartened, sick with tuberculosis, Istrati returned to Romania, where he
WHY can't I have JUST ONE glass of chardonnay (my choice of drug) like a 'normal' drinker? SO NOT FAIR(!) kept playing in my head. My jealousy reached its peak to the point that I had to remove myself from the house for a short time.
I like Majolica Majorca for mascaras and I would repurchase these products and intend to try their new Lash King mascara.I used to like Maybelline for mascaras,but I would find that after an initial good run they`d stop working so well :S
The sentiments expressed are almost all remarkably similar. And they paint a picture of withdrawal from society, and retreat into a private world. People have fallen back on their families, and a narrow circle of friends.
I can’t understand why
The Orange Prize seems to have snuck up on me this year. I had it in my head that the announcement was on the 16th of March until I realised that actually that was 2011’s dates. It took ages to then get confirmation (by searching round the internet for hours) that it was to be the 8th and suddenly now Orange has a lovely new sparkly website, and indeed it will be announced in mere hours. Well I love guessing any prize list, and the Orange is no exception. I have a lot of love for this prize as generally I do prefer female writers (sweeping statement alert) to male ones overall, so I am always excited to see the final list of twenty. In the meantime here are my twenty guesses and why I made those calls…
4 cups all-purpose flour
For this Monday, Scrappingville challenges you to use any stencils fromGet your thinking caps on and let your creative juices flow to make something awesome now! :D Layouts, Mini albums, Altered art, anything is acceptable for this challenge!!!!
4 darkness
John Evan- keyboards
So here's to all the real moms getting it done everyday. I love ya all!
This mess is all we have
He had slight relapses when the cancer became active but for the most part he would take the bus to hospital, have his chemo, get the bus home and be up on his roof fixing an aerial the next day.
This weeks challenge is, make a project using polka dots! I love polka dots, so I loved this challenge! :)
So I wanted to do a thank you. And here it is, I would love to give you one of my photos in a 5x7 or maybe larger, and all you have to do is leave me a comment on which one is your fav, and I will chuck your names into an official hat (okay more like a grocery bag), shake it up really good and pick a winner when I come back.
Because of data — because, more specifically, of the technology that tallies and stores and disseminates data — we can know almost anything we want to know about our species. But there is so much data — purchases, sales, flights, withdrawals, deposits, sports scores, inches of rain, packages mailed, songs downloaded, e-mails sent, text messages typed, cell-phone calls made, cell-phone calls dropped, hours of television watched, passports issued, arrests, releases — that it can all seem to add up to nothing. A meaningless pile. “You can go on Twitter and find out what Shaq ate for lunch, but you haven’t really improved humanity,” Ranadivé likes to say.
Surely I’m not the first man to believe that he is cursed, and surely I won’t be the last. But I will be the last of my blood. To pass this genetic malfunction onto an innocent child, now that it has been fully realized, would be a cruel trick indeed. I have enough on my conscience without adding to the burden. And despite my now-reformed ways and self-imposed mission to earn my proverbial wings, it comes down to the fact that there is no salvation for an old salt like me. I sailed the seas of sin for far too long for that, and left too many victims burning in the wake of my vessel. I don’t need the added guilt of unwanted company in this, my tiny little circle of hell.
Fun fun fun!
In general, defining substances in the claims in a functional way is problematic. If this needs to be done then fall-back positions relating to specific defined substances should be present in the application. Reach through claims are not allowable (which define substances on the basis of them being identifiable using a specified screening method). In addition Examiners are increasingly strict on defining disease conditions in a mechanistic or functional way (such as ‘a condition in which TNF-α levels are elevated’). If such a definition is used in the claims, then the application needs to contain details of how the skilled person can determine whether or not a given condition falls within the definition which is used.
- Review your resources – know your strengths
I told her that I am swamped right now with her Dad but that I also do not want to cart her back and forth to this particular Dr. because I believe that she is selling the suboxone instead of using it. I asked her not to dispute this with me it is really her business and words will not convince me just a series of clean drug tests. I just want to stay out of this affair. I also explained to her that her age is not why she has a rep payee. She has a rep payee because her mental illness can cause poor judgement and she has both a history of not complying with her pscyh medications and also a history of drug addiction punctuated by periods of short remission. I said, that a judge might change the order if she could establish more extensive sober time. Now I wonder if she told the neighbors that I am mishandling her money.
The are photos of some of the "Pandora-Style" glass bead earrings with Swarovski crystals.
Still stares beyond the visible.
There are 5 rules for accepting this award :
I wrote about a bit of an update a year ago (at the conclusion of another long project with Dad), and (drumroll please!) here's how it looks today:
Subject: Re: Reply soonest and call me
Amit Bansal – The problem of lack of workplace ready professionals is becoming severe by the day. Though the number of engineers passing out of engineering colleges has been increasing every year by a CAGR of over 15 per cent in the last 10 years, the supply of employable talent is not meeting the demand. In a nutshell, putting up more buildings and creating more engineering seats is not helping the cause of ready-to-deploy talent. Hence, there is a need for specialized programs that prepare the students for their first job.
Home Sweet Home after a nice walk to die for.
There’s something in the air Pisces and you can't quite put your finger on it?
I made the mistake of telling my BFF Kiki all the details I had failed to share with my parents about L, and to put it lightly, she was totally not cool with me going to Italy. I had to promise to call her daily or else she was going to tell my parents! Can you believe that? So many paranoid people these days… Oh well, I agreed anyhow. It was a few days before Thanksgiving and the time had finally come for me to board the plane (as well as 2 other planes) that would take me to my boyfriend! It took me 17 hours to reach Venice, Italy and when that plane touched down I was so overwhelmed with excitement that I could barely stay seated. I went to the airport washroom and tried to pretty myself up first, but it wasn’t going so well. 17 hours of travel does not produce anything beautiful or even presentable. I sprayed myself with perfume and gave my teeth a brush… On to meet the love of my life!
New York's chief auction houses, Sotheby's and Christie's International, say prices for any artist are heavily contingent upon the whims of supply. It's a rare occurrence that a seller consigns a work as important as Picasso's "Nude, Green Leaves, and Bust," last week's $106.5 million sale.
Haha…sure. When I was writing my first YA novel, I sent a few scenes to an old friend to alpha read for me. She called me and said, “Your character Derek reminds me a lot of XXX from high school.” And you know what? She was correct. I’d subconsciously written about that guy from high school who I always thought was
“What’s your day off Barry?” he asked.
Meeting Darcy Miller which was just sublime - she really knows weddings. There are no words to describe her. (Although if I could find them they would all be good!)
He sat down beside the teenager, began talking to her and offered to drive her to a hotel where her friends had moved on to.
I chose to go to Busan by ferry rather than by plane. It was not because it was cheap, but I wanted my trip to become more different, more adventurous. I wanted to try every taste of life. My friends asked me why I wouldn’t go by plane, but I answered why we wouldn’t try a ferry. Actually, to travel between Japan and South Korea, the plane is the best option, since it is fast, cheap, and comfortable. But, what would you choose if you had 2 choices? Plane which was fast, comfortable or ferry which you never tried? I decided to choose ferry. It wasn’t cheap. It was nearly 200$ for 1 way, and we had to spend one night in it. That was fine to me, because I had a plenty of time for this journey^^. Let’s take on the ferry with me; I still didn’t know yet what wanna happens there? I heard that it was not comfortable at all on the ferry, we could be seasick… Let’s see if we are alright??
Wonderstuff Don’t let me down UK
None! But Kajol is an exception. The swarthy and super-talented actress is learnt to be getting a whopping Rs 2.5 crore for Karan Johar’s next movie My Name Is Khan . It’s a considerable increase for the actress who reportedly charged 1.5 crore for Kunal Kohli’s Fanaa a few years back. Since then, Kajol has only worked in hubby Ajay Devgan ’s directorial debut U Me Aur Hum . Family has become Kajol’s priority and it took Karan Johar some amount of persuasion to convince the actress to end her brief sabbatical with ‘My Name Is Khan’. And like a producer who appreciates true talent, Karan is said to be offering Kajol a market fee commanded by top actresses in Bollywood.
Hataway was accused of attacking Rachael Clarke in August 2008 in Seminole County. Clarke was left in a neck brace with scratches and bruises all over her body.
The bit of remaining baby gear we have -- a few slings, a sling-accommodating jacket, an umbrella stroller, nursing bras (arrgh, I am soooo sick of them) -- haven't disappeared yet because we're still using them. But now, I am starting to think I should hang on to them, JUST IN CASE.
Not to give too much of the plot away, but Andy sees his family's "for locals" restaurant and realizes if it was attractive to foreigners who have money to spend, his Vietnamese family would become better off financially. He works to make this happen with his two cousins, Indy (Hien), his age, and Minh, slightly older, combining their talents, knowledge, and cultures. The discussion of economics was particularly insightful. Andy at first thinks the family restaurant must make tons of money. Then he realizes how much is charged. Only later does he realize to factor in the cost of food. And the cost of labor. And what should be the price of the food? Foreigners can afford to pay more, so should they? But the locals cannot afford the higher prices. But, especially for a restaurant, the locals eat quickly and then leave while the foreigners take their time and linger. Should the pricing take that into account, that instead of four or six local seatings there is only one? What is fair? What is just?
0500am
64. Hey, is it hot in here, or it that just you?
Beef in red wine stew with cheddar dumplings
Even on sunny days only a faint greyness illuminated at all by the globes of the station lights, came through the glass roof over the main hall, and in this eternal dusk, which was full of a muffled babble of voices, a quiet scraping and trampling of feet, innumerable people passed in great tides...
And that’s the crux of the problem: it’s now OK to rip people off. I should feel stupid for trusting someone because, increasingly it seems to me, we live in a world where it’s OK to cheat and lie and steal, we live in a place where greed is good and everyone looks out for number 1. I feel stupid right now because I didn’t play by the rules: I expected someone to be better than thoroughly selfish. I feel stupid and naive because I expected decency and honesty; I am stupid and naive because I expect decency and honesty.
Thank You Lord Jesus for Your life and sacrifice for me.
O Tam! hadst thon but been sae wise
I have so much to say, so much in me that I wished you would understand..
We had a wonderful Thanksgiving and Christmas, and are so looking forward to a Happy New Year. Something tells me it will be. No, not "something"--someone. That someone is God. I have felt his presence so much lately after having a long period of not feeling it. I know God is there, and He's telling me everything will be alright. My prayer is that it will be alright for eveyone reading this right now too. May God bless you and your family in this coming new year.
People with multiple children love all their children and each child individually fills your heart fit to burst so why not other people?
Theist: Truly I have no idea what these things are. Oh did you hear the one about God and the evolution scientist? Are you willing to hear it?
Polls open at 7am tomorrow and close at 10pm.
The part that caught my attention was the complaint that “33% of doctors spend more than 10 hours a week on paperwork and administration.” Only 10 hours? I spend 10 hours in meetings. I probably spend 80% of my working hours on project management type of work rather than actual engineering.
Her: silence. just tears.
Are you playing along in these challenges? If not, you are missing some wonderful images, great challenges and lots of fun!!
Dumb cliches work with young people because pop culture is always evolving (perhaps devolving is a more accurate word) so there are new images to work with all the time. But the cliches we've developed for old farts haven't changed at all. We need a new visual language.
Forgive me for just a moment, but at first I thought you were asking after my five favorite books about desert islands. I wasn’t sure I had read any that would qualify unless they started writing novelizations of Gilligan’s Island episodes. Then my brain clicked and now the question is even tougher. What five books would I take to the island? I have hundreds of books in my library, many waiting to be read, so although I have a few favorites, I’m going to have to go with the next five on my list of to be read and hope the supply ship shows up soon.
Self-Published Book Wins National Award For 'Best Single Breed Book' And Becomes Surprise Bestseller - Authors Pictured In The New York Times
These are the times that try men's souls, as Thomas Paine once wrote. Glenn, that includes you. Prayerfully consider the possibility that we live in a time when united we fall, divided we stand. It's not conventional wisdom, and it certainly was not what we learned in school. But in a world that is being increasingly oppressed by multinational corporations and overcentralized governments, it may very well be the truth.
As Christians, we recognize the term “Bible” when we hear it, but how much do we really know about the book itself? If you were asked. “How many books are there in the Bible?”, or “What version of the Bible do you use?” what would you answer? Don’t be ashamed if you don’t know the answers, you are not alone! Come to this session and learn some basics about the best selling book in the world! And yes, bring your Bible!!!
We watched a chick-flick-feel-good-about-yourself movie the other night. I had already watched it at the movies several months ago. But now sitting in my living room a sentence stuck out when one of the actors said, “How’s your heart today?” My kids immediately looked over at me and started teasing me with the question. My best friend, of course, cheers them on, instigating and making sure that the mockery is over used as much as possible. It’s all in fun. “How’s your heart today?” My daughter patted me on my shoulder with a concern look and a wicked smile. I knew it would be a while before they let that sentence go.
Well I haven’t figured out where to buy this poster yet because the Bibliothèque Museum Store doesn’t carry it anymore. And I know I’ve been on a Dieter Rams run for the last few weeks, as soon as I get back to RISD I’ll find more stuff in a wider variety and stop boring you guys :P
Across the street, at the Times Building, a drug store window exploded, and "many bottles of perfume and drugs" were hurled at passers-by.
That's because the human papillomavirus (HPV) is a major trigger for these cancers, and HPV can be transmitted through this type of sexual activity.
I hate when I can't be on the go
He named his last boy “Brandon Kent” after cigarette brands.
1/2 c. brown sugar
EDIT: Turns out there IS a bus that would get me out there. Oh well, good info for the future.
The three installations that were in my mind the most enchanting included:
Nutrition :
These gifts are certain indicators of a future happiness, or bliss – indicators for men who, barely existing, are as sons of the Most High.
I love this last one. E figured out pretty quick that the eggs had CANDY inside. Forget this gathering for fun stuff. He had to stop right then, empty his pockets and start eating immediately. And since big M couldn't eat the candy and G just wasn't as interested as his younger, sugar addicted brother, E made a right haul. Below is the haul. Yeah, we had to drag him away. Guess what his favorite holiday is now?
2.) Create Term Limits for all Branches of Government limiting service to no more than 12 years per office held.
Please recall that Kharma, who left the WWE after the May 30, 2011 episode of RAW, vowed to destroy the Bellas upon her return if they were still with the company…
By now, most U.S. practitioners have come to either love or loathe the current and evolving state of the law concerning "fraud" in the prosecution and maintenance of federal trademark applications and registrations. Below is a summary of the law and some practice tips for avoiding problems down the road.
Before you write that email, let me reply: No, you don't get it. Sure people use the web in a social way to find stuff and get information. But the peer-to-peer stuff is the tip of the web iceberg. It is dwarfed by the way the web has become just another engine for spreading the media gospel of what we are supposed to believe and how we are supposed to behave. Once again, we are seeing a tree and missing a forest.
2 months
Please note - this is NOT my last mug shot... I still have about 7 to do!
"Gaddafi knew it was over after his troops were pushed out of Misrata," a major hub of the uprising, on April 25, said Daou.
The former Bar Council chairman also expressed suspicion in the sudden speed with which the just-passed law had come into force, just five days before Bersih’s planned assembly this Saturday.
I’m Klaus Langpohl and I’m a beekeeper. Our estate apiary sits by the side of St Mary’s Bay in Nova Scotia Canada, where our bees happily gather nectar from the wildflowers and fruit trees here on the estate, as well as from the blossoms in the nearby organic farms.
I cant imagine being in pain 24/7 like my husband is!
I wanted to share with you what I worked on yesterday. Remember my previous post with all the those Dr. Seuss themed centers and freebies well.....I made them all yesterday in between conferences! Today I am going to go and laminate them at Mardels.
Van Buskirk is due to be sentenced on the assault charge Wednesday. Acting police chief Al Frederick has reserved comment until then.
Why in the world do I let them sit and sit? It really doesn't take that long to fold them and put them away.
Sea lice, in particular, are a problem. In a recent L.A. Times story, Alexandra Morton, an independent biologist and critic of salmon farms, is quoted as beginning to see sea lice in 2001 when a fisherman brought her two baby pink salmon covered with them. Examining more than 700 baby pink salmon around farms, she found that 78 percent were covered with a fatal load of sea lice while juvenile salmon she netted farther from the farms were largely lice-free.
* Commitment to the mission of the agency, helping those involved in the criminal justice system to break the cycle of crime and incarceration.
Chris the Beautiful said: "no one can stop us from making records ... not even by not listening to them."
The cars pulled up outside 426 Henry St. Reporters and photographers, along with members of Scotland Yard and the Secret Service all got themselves in position. And then the man himself emerged. Donning a black Homburg hat, carrying a gold-headed cane, and with a cigar clenched in his teeth, British Prime Minister Winston Churchill stepped onto the Brooklyn street and walked toward the modest, red brick house that was his destination.
More turtles.
Mysterious and dark.
Plants are capable of problem solving and communication:
I generally get dreams that don’t really make sense. I think that most people do. The ones that disconcert me are the ones where they feel real.
And so to my Number One Act. They played two sets; one on the Park stage on Friday and one on the John Peel Stage on Saturday afternoon and they are the all-female foursome from Los Angeles – Warpaint. Warpaint is such a clever name for starters, combining the slang for makeup, thus underlining their gender, with the more tribal connotations of warfare. Their music could also be described as ‘tribal’ being a cross between 1982 Cure/Siouxsie gothic and 1992 Cocteau Twins. It has a peculiar quality of being quite mesmerising without seeming to go anywhere in particular. Somehow, it doesn’t really matter as the heavily chorused guitars chime over intricate bass patterns and complex drumming and you are drawn in forever. Their live vocals could do with beefing up a bit as they don’t quite match the studio versions I now have in my possession on their debut album, ‘Fool’ but otherwise they were beautifully understated, yet wonderful and worthy winners this year.
It's difficult being a dad under the very best of circumstances and these two men had to find a way to be close to their kids in spite of the numerous issues that often come from divorce.
HISTORIC PRIORY #2, NORMANDY
I recently wrote a piece for the website of the Chicago Sun-Times, discussing both my history of ME and my reactions to the new documentary Voices from the Shadows. For anyone who wishes to understand the agony ME can inflict, and the dangerous ignorance endured by many who have it, the film is a must-see. One of the ME sufferers it profiles is Sophia Mirza, the first person in Britain whose death was officially listed as being caused by chronic fatigue syndrome. Another is my late friend, Lynn Gilderdale, whose mother assisted in her suicide after Lynn's condition became unendurable.
The firm said it would continue brewing McEwan's draught ales at the Caledonian Brewery in Edinburgh.
Here is a close shot of the coloring. I stamped santa in tuxedo black memento ink and then colored him with my copics. R32,35,59 for the reds and W00,1,3,5 for the whites. He is stamped on the new X-press it blending card paper from copic. I airbrushed it with a combo of E50 and YR31 at half strengh to blend it into my patterned paper layout.
Here is the photo I chose for today's challenge.
Broil red peppers under a broiler or open flame on gas stove until charred on all sides. Place red peppers in a bowl and cover with plastic wrap. Set aside until cool enough to handle. Peel, remove seeds, and roughly chop.
First, though, what is genre? Merriam-Webster says:
It is the last stretch of Spring break and it is a rainy mess outside. A perfect wet and gloomy day to stay in and get cozy. Who is the bonehead that takes her squirly kids out on errands in this weather you ask!? ME! Ha ha! Ugh! Not my very best idea, but I couldn't imagine an entire day stuck indoors with them. The silly squirrels get squirly for sure! ha ha!
It's a real game.
Unmarried couple who live together and “lewdly associate” with one another may face up to a year in prison. Uh Oh.
That all changed with the white ear buds. Even now, several years later, I still remember the first silhouette commercials with indie music playing on the iPod…and the white ear buds. Those things became a status symbol. If you had the white ear buds, you were part of the club. The ‘in crowd’. You were the next generation of cool kid.
BeFrugal.com offers free coupons and Cash Back, with an average rate of 5% at 2000+ online stores. For even more savings, sign up for a free account now and get a $10 bonus. Hurry! The $10 bonus offer is only available for a limited time.
For the femmes out there- peruse the A Bella Says pages. You might agree.
The panda ponders this for a moment and replies, "Hmmn. You know, not everything is black and white like that."
The shameful nights hope to forget
This can be done during prep or on the fly. I recommend applying Information Thresholds to large groups of dungeon residents ahead of time.
5. Bloodflow (7:36)
Hood nodded. “I know it’s a bit of a haul. I know it will be dangerous. But, we’re going to need everything we can get and we’re going to need it here – not a hundred and some miles away.”
1986 – Platoon
I hope your celebrating a lovely Spring weekend...whether it's dying Easter Eggs with your family or enjoying the lovely spring blossoms.
I will not do this with anger, but with love and intention. I will mourn, but I will celebrate. I will share, and I will push some limits. I will say YES to my ever-changing life. My new sexy is waiting, unique and undefined.
For the past few years I have been a member of a great online community sponsered by Fiskars. Before I joined this group when I thought of Fiskars, the only thing that came to my mind was the famous orange handled scissors. Now when I think of them, I think of all kinds of fun scissors, squeeze punches, border punches, corner punches, trimmers, and of course friendship and support. Today I am privilaged to join them in the Fiskateers first ever blog hop. Before I tell you about my fun project lets get a little housekeeping out of the way, if you have come here from "Kelly Starsky 6446" then you are in the right place. If you have stumbled upon the blog hop you can start at the beginning at the Fiskateers Blog.
Having worked within the museum system myself for a few years, if the city/historical society agreed to pay for removal, I'm not sure what expenses the property owner would incur. If he himself decided to let the building remain, there are possible tax incentives for doing so when the property or building is listed on the NRHP.
Before I continue with the good time haze of my St. Paddy's day I must pose a question: Why don't more girls rock on guitar? I mean lots of girls strum folk or do chick punk, but very few rock. Name 4 chicks you would say can *REALLY* jam (solo) on guitar? I can name one at SXSW, Susan Tedeschi.
Then suddenly in the early hours of Saturday morning, this changed.
But only right now.
This was such a lovely feeling that I moved onto cull my closets, which led to sorting through my papers and files. Eventually, I gained enough momentum to revamp or toss entire photo albums. Do I need to keep photos of five-boyfriends-ago? No. I tossed them as quickly as I tossed their matching gotchies.
Cinnamon stick - 2 cm length
So. Much. Joy.
March 31st:
It is a dress with a short flared skirt which can be worn with or without a net petticoat. Off the shoulder neck-line has fancy frills. The frills have black latex ribbon threaded through them. Long sleeves with matching frilled cuffs. Apron has frilled edge and a big bow on the back.
Unfortunately, the vast majority of people were uninformed about the personality trait of introversion when I was growing up. The result is that I got labelled because I was different from the norm. I became the “shy” one, and then later in my adult life, I became the “anti-social” one.
was
You belong here if … you regularly steal bagels, fruit or cereal out of Ludwig. (How else are you supposed to eat?)
In the words of the apostle Paul, Vonette and I became voluntary “slaves” of Jesus that Sunday afternoon, by choice, as an act of the will.
Superior style
Everything she'd taught me..........
Most recently at Legrande Filles et Fils, a quaint wine bar tucked away in the Galerie Vivienne, a lovely consortium of restaurants and boutiques. It was early evening and Fred and I were the first customers. We grabbed two seats at the corner and ordered our wine. Shortly thereafter, two middle-aged American women walked in and plopped themselves and tons of shopping bags down on the stools next to ours. They picked up the wine list and made a big production about not knowing where the different regions were and whether Saint Emilion was in Bordeaux. I finally told them yes, mainly to shut them up, and then Fred politely explained the different regions to them.
He kindly went off to the shop for me and duly paid for her and carried her back to the car. He most certainly didn't want to be seen pushing a tea trolley along the pavement.........
"Keep going," said their dad, raising his voice to be heard above the wind. "It's fine!"
As a footnote, I know several of you are reading this post and wondering what in the world our plans are. To be honest, we're still praying for God to reveal His plan for our future. For now, we continue to split our time between the house at the farm and the fixer upper in my hometown. It's like the best of both worlds, but we know we're going to have to set it down somewhere permanently soon. We briefly looked at houses, but found nothing, so we've put off making any big decisions until January. It's an election year, so things are crazy at the newspaper and will continue to be so up until the General Election in November and Adam is awaiting word on future work, so for now, we're saying we'll wait and see where God would have us.
our beers are not available out of state yet. I then
If it is correct, then it is cunning plan of which Baldrick himself would be proud!
Unfortunately, as shareholders we’ve demanded continuous and unsustainable growth and our Directors have failed to accurately report the state of the environment or manage our expectations, culminating in new set KPI’s (Key Performance Indicators) all premised on ongoing (unsustainable) economic growth.
Last night was Shannon's chorus Spring Showcase. Her chorus sang two songs, and she had a solo! We think s he did a great job! What I'm most proud of though, is that it's HER idea to try out for these solos, to practice them, and that she has the courage to stand up in front of a large group and SING. Awesome!
I was almost afraid to start on this project, sure I would make a mistake, and then I remembered what I used to tell my students when I taught them how to use polymer clay -- "THERE ARE NO MISTAKES!" So I took myself out of frozen-in-fear mode, kept reminding myself of my own advice, and plunged ahead. Below is what I accomplished yesterday. I will be making some changes, but I'm okay with it so far. Actually, it's much better than I expected, and I am thrilled! It's the first time I've tried anything like a fiber mosaic.
knead lightly (without over-mixing)
Platypus has the same issue that octopus had, in that it is a Greek word, but was given the Latin ending, becoming platypi. If it were given its proper Greek ending, it would become platypodes. Despite how cool this word sounds, it is basically completely unused. Many people drop the ending all together and use platypus as the singular and the plural in the same way that sheep is the plural of sheep. Add on the fourth ending, the English one, and we have platypuses, the most commonly used, at least in the United States.
As one who has gone through pain in my Life, I can affirm this.
If Freeloader Classic is connected to a device that has a near full battery (if for example you were testing Freeloader Classic from new), Freeloader Classic would, potentially, not deliver power because if the battery in the device has more or equal power than the Freeloader Classic, Freeloader Classic will not be able to deliver power. Wait until the device to be charged is 50% to 60% full
The last weeks this little part of the dialogue has started to work itself into my mind and the meaning of it.
Spinach and Parmesan Quiche
btw, just like I’ve done (and since I deleted everyone else), you need to protect your tweets like I have .. eliza
Thank you Kim, for the gifts but for also being my friend.
Curated by historian David Starkey, the exhibition, part of the Diamond Jubilee celebrations, focuses on the use of the river across five centuries covering events including Anne Boleyn’s coronation procession and Admiral Lord Nelson’s stately funeral through to the evolving Lord Mayor’s pageant and the ‘Great Stink’ of the mid-1800s.
Gosh. Trial by jury? Right to a speedy trial? Right to reasonable bail? Now these are really going to tax (hah!) your ability to define products we need to buy. But as I said before, I have confidence in you and your fellow senators ability to find ways to meddle.
.....as my son would say. He's only in Pre-K and already he can't wait for Friday's!!! Anyway, just wanted to give you a little look of the project I posted on the Maya Road blog this morning. If you're looking for a Mother's Day gift idea or just something for a girlfriend, this might do the trick.
1 leather
Then the characters go mad! Instead of planning a defense, they rush out of the encampment and the cleric miraculously turns 13 of the remaining 25 skellies! Now everyone gets in on it. The undead concentrate on killing the dragon, but the evolved wight also carries a staff of lightning bolt (4d6) The dragon dies. The cleric heals the dragon (!) and together they defeat all the undead! Then get this:
So, I think the tomatoes were about yay big in their four to five seedling trays when I had a little coming to Jesus moment with Bubba.
Senator John Whitmire, a Democrat from Houston, represents Texas Senate District 15 and serves as Chairman of the Senate Criminal Justice Committee.
The deliberation was even more difficult, particularly since the three of us in the panel agreed on our finalists, but were really conflicted about who to actually offer the position to given that all of our interviewees were excellent in unique ways. We didn’t know which person to take for the longest time. This cycle happened at least three times:
Creating a Movement is online training that will help you create a cohesive, guiding, yet simple plan for a disciple making youth ministry. You will learn to involve others in the planning process so that when you finish, there is a team of committed adult volunteers that are now invested and engaged in the future of the youth ministry.
Piggy Contact Lens Case,
Anyway - it seems ages since I have made an ATC and I loved making this one - shabby vintage yet again.
I also saw the California premiere of Silver Bullets, one of the half-dozen features the prolific young director Joe Swanberg has completed since his third one Hannah Takes The Stairs played here nearly four years ago. If Silver Bullets (my own first encounter with his directing work) is at all typical, I can understand why he polarizes audiences (and perhaps programmers as well); though there's evidence of conceptual brilliance, it's overshadowed by a half-heartedness of execution that asserts itself as a visual style. Or perhaps in place of one.
The good news is that for all the places, save for Tokyo, I have a set of common (own) slides to present (just a few tweaks). For Tokyo I was hurriedly capturing (using Snapz Pro X on the Mac - great app) the video of what I had to talk about (from a talk in San Jose a few weeks earlier). It just finished post-processing (thankfully) about 2 minutes before I left home ! Thankfully I have a 12hr flight to rehearse the presentation in time for a rehearsal tomorrow.
February sucks. Every year for ME - February sucks. I get moody, tired, unmotivated and generally I just don't feel like myself. I like to call it the February Blues. It's actually fairly common. I have been doing some reading on the subject in the last week or so and I came across some research done in December 2010, by some German Doctors. The research followed approx 2000 people in Germany (mainly women) - having them document on a daily online journal, how they were feeling on each specific day. The research also followed weather trends in those areas - and in the end the two were cross referenced and the results showed a definite link between mood & weather! They also stated that a Vitamin D deficiency can be a root source of the winter blues (I take 2000iu every day right now!), as well as a genetic inheritance from your mother! (I spoke to my mom a few days ago, who said she used to feel this way every now & then - so maybe?!). Another thought behind the winter blues is the reduced sunlight during the fall and winter months. Less sun = a reduced production of serotonin in the the brain. Serotonin in our bodies has a soothing, calming effect. The result of there not being enough serotonin is feelings of depression along with symptoms of fatigue, etc. So this is REAL folks, it's a reality for me!
The bankrupt country which was wracked by 454-percent-a-year hyperinflation in the early 1980s has now achieved a high-tech-based economy, albeit with enormous disparities of wealth. Prices are stable if high, and the shekel has become a hard currency. Futures in Israeli money now trade on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, and Israel is a member of the OECD — the exclusive club of the world’s most successful countries.
But – so many buts. It would look rather silly in a city suburb, next to a mall. Too many windows to clean, too many stairs to climb. It was, and still is, a lovely dream. I’ve designed it a hundred times in my mind, perfecting all the details. Probably the reality could never live up to my aspirations. I’m not unhappy if it remains a castle in the air.
Allowing him to own her.
NAMA is quietly building up a tally of companies it has put into receivership (there is an up to date list maintained under the Developers Tab)
Several observations: I had various ideas about my approach to parenting while I was pregnant, which all seem to have flown out the window. I wanted my baby to be able to entertain herself and play alone, so I thought I would leave her be to play and coo by herself. But instead, if her eyes are open, I find myself cooing and oohing and making a general fool of myself on her behalf every single second she is awake. I'm sure there is still plenty of time to come for independent play as she is so young, but so far I am one of those ridiculous, drooly helicopter parents. I also thought I would be fine letting my baby "cry it out," but it turns out I'm a total softy and I can't handle letting her cry for more than 2 minutes. And even that kills me.
Myparents got together (not in the contemporary sense, I hasten to add) on New Year’s Eve 1940. The Blitz was in full swing in Manchester and, having met at a dance, they were later forced to take shelter from the Luftwaffe’s incendiary bombs in the old Exchange Station. They were there for hours, and I remember Mum telling me that there were no loos available and she was far too inhibited to go for a pee. Major romances start on a lot less than this.
And then she was gone...
** Denotes "HG" status
Trying to stay on as much of the original Route 66 as possible kept me off Interstate 40, which supplanted 66, at least some of the time. Often it was just driving the frontage road, but since I hate freeways and roaring semis, I enjoyed the slower pace.
“Si unanilalia. I can’t breath. Support your weight.” OK.
When we first practiced ‘MAMA”s choreography, I thought I was going to be the black hole. Euhaha. I thought ‘I’m in a big trouble’ but I practiced all night alone with Kai or Sehun, they taught me precisely the moves one by one so it was really a relief.
The truck had other ideas. About 20km past Victor Harbor there was a big whooosing noise and then a pfuuf pfuuf pfuuf hissing noise that sounded like it was not good news. We pulled over and Tim had a look at the engine bits and the hose from the intercooler into the turbo had come off (please ignore any technical jargon! i might be giving things the wrong names so if you actually care about the mechanical side of things please talk to someone other than me!!!!). Much cursing and headshaking and Tim stuck a couple of cable ties around to keep it on and we crossed our fingers for a town or service station.
I gently cooked some bacon, which I added to the pheasants, along with some game stock from the freezer.
Neither song charted.
The little cafe au lait bowl was an Etsy find that arrived from France this week. It is OLD and soooooo pretty with its little purple flowers. It looks great on the French booklet I found at an antique mall.
The best part about it was a sign that was filmed at the beginning which read "'Bloody' Good Firework. The placement of the quotations marks was truly delightful.
Love and hugs to you all,
You're more than welcome to download her for coloring. Have a good Tuesday everyone.
Of what we had
Currently in craft beer, there is nobody who can compete with the packaging of 21st Amendment Brewery. They absolutely understand how to design beautiful packaging and brew great tasting beer. So, take 2 of my passions and combine them and you get a great combination and currently one of my favorite brewers on the planet.
since i was sick over the weekend, i didn’t get out to see the watered trees and grass until saturday. everything was so lovely.
But otherwise, in retrospect, I have to believe that my parents lived a part of their childhood through us.
Here is everything that I've acquired
And, in real life, there are an increasing number of librarians who are notable not just for their pink-streaked hair but also for their passion for pop culture, activism and technology.Well duh. Anyone who streaks their hair pink is doing it because they're passionate. PINK: P is for pop culture, I is for actIvism, N is for techNology, and K is for Konichiwa bitches!!!
Some people think love is too much to bear
All of this—the initial report of the accident, the rumors flying around after that report, the revelation of Petrino’s female passenger and his relationship with her, and the response of the national media—has reminded me of some wise words I once heard from Jimmy Allen.
MINEOLA, N.Y. (AP) — A New York prosecutor is joining legislators in calling for tougher laws and penalties for those who abuse animals.
Three of them sprinted towards her.
YOU ALL ARE AWESOME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Being a Mercedes, it still retains a classy, upmarket interior. Naturally AMG has done a fine job of replacing the mundane bits with sporty carbon fibre items. Take the seats for example. These are two-tone red and black bucket seats that do a fine job of keeping you firmly in place. The steering wheel is part suede/alcantara leather and it feels lovely. For the money, you’re getting all the luxury items that you’d expect from Mercedes-Benz. Satellite navigation, climate control, Bluetooth telephone, aluminium pedals are just some things you can expect. It’s safe too and comes with exceptionally strong brakes, an over-zealous traction control system that constantly nags as well as airbags lining the cabin.
Anthony Eden. Before Commonwealth P.M. mtg.
Acknowledging its poor performance in India, Kellogg’s decided to sell biscuits as a strategy to establish its brand equity. Kellogg’s biscuits are produced only in India and there are six flavors – Chocos, Glucose, Chocolate Cream, Badam, Pista and Cashew.
Gov. Christie signed a bill that would put the windmill so far out at sea it could not be seen from the land, but that ignores the fact that it will cost taxpayers $7 million to construct it, half of which will be paid by a federal grant, and the result will be an increase in consumer rates. Why would any sensible person want to spend that kind of money on a single windmill?
The city comes alive during festive season. Eid-ul-Fitr, Diwali, dussera , Holi , Christmas and all the other minor ones. The city prays, fasts, gorges on great food and celebrates together. Everyone is drenched in the color of bonhomie and reverence irrespective of their religion.
A round-up will appear the week beginning February 21st when a winner will be announced.
Paul went through so many crazy life events but he knew God was training Him in contentment in them. So I must trust the same. I have not been through all Paul has been through but there are other thorns as well that will work to keep me humble. Thorns that may or may not be removed though I plead continually for them to be. I must walk, trust, and be content. Our Father only allows what is for our good and His glory in the end. I trust that.
Such joy wrapped around the pain
Beck
and found myself in the words.
Sakthi Sugars Limited has informed the Exchange that the Company has decided to publish audited financial results for the year ended March 31, 2012 within 60 days from the end of the financial year.
“He had only learned about his father’s time here when his elderly mother gave him the diary and a photo album in the late 1990s. Until then he knew little about his father’s life. It almost feels like fate that the Tourist Board placed Takayoshi with us at Angeldale,” he says.
As of now we are in the full swing of Cycle 4, which always keeps us busy. During week 5 we will have rising Upper Elementary 6th year students visit our classroom so that they know what to expect next year when they move up to Middle School.
Now, Reggie Evans is a wicked story. I was watching him last night away from the ball, and he’s incredible. Firstly, he entered the game to huge cheers and he immediately grabs a reeb, sets a monstrous pick for Paul that leads to an easy jay, and then comes back on dee and was facing up Gasol and grabs the steal. All in like, thirty seconds. Blam. The guy is a pro. But if you watch him real close, he’s titty twisting guys and scratching and pushing and clawing and all seemingly innocent battles for rebounds and positioning but it reminds me of a story I read about him when he played for the Sixers and a dude was trying out for the squad and how the dude wrote he battled Reggie Evans all scrimmage and was left with red welts and bruises, scratches, and cuts all over his body. Dude had never had that happen. So, watch Reggie close and watch his hands. And how he squeezes dudes. It’s kind of remarkable. And I think he gets away with the Perfect Weapon hands because he’s not necessarily planting moving picks or kneeing dudes or climbing over dudes’ backs. He’s just grabbing at ya. Well, he does do all of what I just wrote. He probably learned from watching Dennis Rodman and remember Ryan W. (U and S logo artist) telling us how Rodman would put his thumb in unique places on opposing dudes’ bodies? And, I just now got your “stuff like that” joke/riff. Sir Reggie was a Raptor and that was probably uttered in every sentence of his when interviewed. We of the Toronto Raptor fan base.
Thank you for being my mirror. Without you, I would not see what I need to see in myself.
I wrote that whole last blog post and forgot to post my big news! We got our next duty assignment, and will (MOST LIKELY) be heading to Robins AFB in August! It wasn't the top of our list, but it was still on the list, so we're pretty happy about it :) We'll be half a day's drive from my mom, and the area is supposed to have beautiful state parks and lakes and great fishing, so J is very happy about that. I'm happy that Macon has a yarn shop with Knit Nights, and that we'll be less than 2 hours from Atlanta, which has great food and great shopping! (IKEA!! H&M!!)
The original score in the series is a feast for the ears and you will absolutely love the opening theme song, “Sign of Love” by immi that has become a favorite in the halls of this office. On top of that, the voice acting is simply stellar with Daisuke Namikawa, Takahiro Sakurai and Fuyuko Ohuro standing out among an excellent cast. There’s no English dub just in case you were wondering.
Honors composition was a challenging class. All year I’ve had to push myself to think outside the box and expand my creativity. In the end, it was all worth it.
So guys, I have not that much to share with you . My friend passed his driving test, so he`ll be roaming the streets soon. Also today I had an interview in an University.
While Janus seemed to balance his two faces evenly in looking back and looking forward, I seem to have a slight bias to looking ahead at the time of New Year.
from water to water
The Swift Satire Competition, which for the last number of years was organized by Boyne Writers Group for the Trim Swift Festival, is not being held this year. In its place the festival has come up with this idea: A five minute drama competition.
1) #1 Florida Gators (SEC) @ #Miami (FL) Hurricanes (ACC), Friday-Sunday/Coral Gables, FL
April marked my two year Etsyversary, and this week is my birthday! I thought it would be really fun to celebrate together -- so my gift to you is 5 days of incredible giveaways!
us for a sleep-over afterwards. ;-)
I tried to temporarily adjust the ph of the soil with diluted vinegar and removed all the old leaves remaining. New leaves are coming in now and the blueberries are plumping up nicely.
Trains were particularly delayed between London Marylebone and Birmingham Snow Hill.
Those were supposed to be main character’s relatives who wave their arms and shake their head in denial: – No, you can’t be an artist! You are a woman and you have to know your place.
Instead, I would like to focus on some other things made illegal because our legislators believe they are looking out for the well being of their constituents.
This was far from a simple breach of trust, and cannot be judged in simple monetary terms against such cases.
I hid the pruners behind my back and waited until birdsong distracted her, quickly cutting the branches that hung over the grass. Brave behind sharp blades, I cut deeper, thick branches and twiggy undergrowth falling round my feet. Embarrassed by our intimacy, I stepped back and gasped. Where once stood a dignified beauty, a tawdry hoochie now glared back. Bony ankles and long thin legs soared past the flowing skirts of her neighbors, their eyes averted, their tongues wagging. A flowing shawl of dark green framed a flat stomach and bare chest. She stood like a flamenco dancer, brazen and beautiful. Her layers of leaves lay thrown against the grass, see-through lingerie replacing the girdle and sensible shoes.
*Die-cut with a body or face that can be enhanced with chalk. I used the Mermaid cut from
Phoenix Rising Digital Illustration:
Sate Banjar
Drew Rosenhaus said he is still in talks with the Panthers about veteran tight end Jeremy Shockey, although Rosenhaus believes Shockey likely will land elsewhere.
And sunlight always shines down through cottonwood trees.
Insulin: In the most simplest explanation, Insulin is a BRILLIANT GENIUS hormone that reacts to our blood glucose/sugar and then it knows what to do with it. Insulin is secreted/made when it receives this blood sugar then its function is primarily to send it to the liver to be stored as glycogen(similar to alcohol)..too much insulin (from too much blood sugar) and the liver then stores it as fat! That is the reason that sugar causes obesity when it's so low calorie per tsp.
Moaning enticing yearnings
Imagine if you had the power to influence people’s subconscious minds.
Bake for 15-20 minutes until golden and well cooked.
Cast : Shelley Winters, Stuart Whitman, Bradford Dillman, Carol Eve Rossen, Roger Perry, Gary Clarke, Leslie Charleson, Johnny Scott Lee, George Burrafato, Pelly Sutton
Overall, if you’re a Gears fan or love third person cover based action, RAAMs Shadow is worth a download. It gives you some interesting back story to a different event in the Gears universe, adds cool moments like using the Hammer of Dawn command post, tense boss fights, and the ability to cause some destruction with General RAAM himself. It’ll also allow you Gears vets to relive the old days with destroying e-holes and the building hoping nature of the first game. Sure it does have a few quirks mentioned above like tedious enemy choke points, continuity/prequel issues, and no major story reveals, it’s still a ton of fun to play and that’s what’s important here. It’ll also run you about 3 hours which for DLC isn’t bad at all. Now that we got to play as RAAM, here’s to more alternate Gears events featuring General Skorge. Ah, we can dream can’t we?
The "gift from the gods" proved to be a mixed blessing when the tribesmen tussled over it and eventually used it as a weapon. To keep the peace in the village, Xi was assigned to take the bottle to "the end of the earth" and throw it back to the gods… and that is when the actual story begins.
4 Big 'P'
Air NZ takes possession of ‘cuddle class’ plane
I first heard of this site but couldn’t find it. My next attempt found the site but was refused entrance by a new employee at the resorts main entrance. My third time was a charm walking right in with a visitor pass directly to the sacred sand procuring these photos.
I guess Madame Bovary, in French, for a college French Lit class. It was exhausting and took forever, and I had to cheat and read the last few chapters in English. And then after all that suffering I hate the book anyway.
When making important decisions about your finances, your children and your lifestyle it is important to be in as calm a state of mind as possible. People who make the best choices in their divorce negotiations are able to separate their actions from their reactions — in other words, they are able to think about what is best for themselves and their families separately from the emotions they feel about the adultery. Choosing divorce lawyers and other professionals who can work together to support a family through all aspects of this painful situation is probably the best way to get through it successfully. More information about how this can work is available at CollaborativePractice.com and WestchesterFamilyLaw.com.
“The only person who can truly persuade you is yourself. You must turn the issues over in your mind at leisure, consider the many arguments, let them simmer, and after a long time turn your preferences into convictions. (Milton Friedman)”
11.Russia 41
One other thing that was very noticeable was the number of competitors who were smiling (not just at the camera). Competing (or participating) is also about enjoying what you do and living life to the full whether you win a prize or not. Be a participator in life, not just a spectator.
How will Malians respond? Early reactions I’ve heard and read online have expressed relief that perhaps Mali’s political nightmare may finally be ending.
Start eatin’ healthy dishes
We're at booth 1008! Hope to see you there!
* California Emergency Management Agency * California Emergency Medical Services Authority * California Employment Development Department (EDD) * California Employment Information State Jobs * California Employment Training Panel * California Energy Commission * California Environment and Natural Resources Agency * California Environmental Protection Agency (Cal/EPA) * California Environmental Resources Evaluation System (CERES) * California Executive Office * California Export Laboratory Services * California Exposition and State Fair (Cal Expo) * California Fair Political Practices Commission
There are also times when we set schooling aside in order to help someone in need. While this may seem to contradict my priority list, teaching my children to help a friend in need is working toward teaching them godly character (#3) while performing a ministry to others (#5 and #6).
I know of NO OTHER honors society that even looks at the accomplishments of kids under 14 years old.
In a stunning example of double talk (or Orwellian “Newspeak”), the Rev. David May, a “trainer,” claimed that while some kids might be practicing racism “unawares,” other kids might be victims of said racism and not even know it.
- Seek out more friends on these sites.
Ten points to those of us who recognised the reference in my title!*
If Robert Fisk Is Speaking Openly of Muslim Racism, Can We Now Talk About The Problem? Joltin’ Joe Biden says Israel has the right to strike Iran Moody’s downgrades Israel’s outlook Overnight music video The PalArab prisoner cause jumps the shark There’s just one little condition… С Днем Победы! by IDFrussiandesk It’s official: Russia’s not supplying Iran with the S-300 День Победы на иврите и русском (для НТВ) by sorryblin
So to have listened to Mussolini in the 1920's or even earlier would be to have heard most of the Leftist ideas that are still being preached today. Intellectually, the 20th century was largely Mussolini's, strange though that may at first seem. He substantially foreshadowed not only Lenin, Stalin and Hitler but even Gorbachev, Deng and Tony Blair. If any one man therefore has a claim to embody the Leftist politics of the 20th century, it is surely Mussolini.
According to Wikipedia, Marquette University was the first catholic college in the world to go co-ed in 1909. If Ms. Mertes took four years for her education, then she was part of the first entering class of women in Marquette.
I will cling to You even when I can’t understand the bigger things.
My parents used to take us to Rock Harbor in Orleans after a long day at the beach. We would get an ice cream, watch the fishing boats come in, and then watch the sun set over the ocean. It was always crowded and bustling. Once there was a steel drum band playing while the sun went down.
She said, 'Yes, that's right. Do you remember what you said to me that night?'
Will Jane meet the same fate as she did in the other time? Or will divine justice be served?
I've felt very sore since, and only managed a gentle four miles through the parks last night by way of a shakeout run. Rest and cake should see me right for a long session at the weekend though.
While these are memorable strokes on a larger canvas, I do think it’s possible to find a deeper meaning in Cube, although not one that will be of any value to its characters. In due course we hear speculation that some of them may have helped create the Cube. Or perhaps they simply allowed it to happen through inaction or apathy. Nothing is certain but the message is underscored in other ways. We are all contributors — or at least indifferent — to the grand mechanisms of our self-destruction. If that subtext is intended, I’m not sure of its specific crusade. Politics? Economics? Environment? Or something else entirely? So few of our questions have been answered to this point, and now is no different. As in the Neorealism of Italian cinema, problems abound, with solutions unfound.
The sweet little old lady was coming down the alley hollering something like, “You trouble making little whippersnappers stop that this instant!” (I have no actual recollection of what she hollered at us that afternoon, but my brain finds this amusing so I’ll roll with it).
“Toba Inlet, up the coast.”
I can't believe we pulled it off, but not one present was opened until most of us were back in our jammies after church.
In 1976 Bobby died of a heart attack. The following year Jack Bradley - former Hackett manager and close friend - asked Gordon Brooks, the leader of The Clam Shack Serenaders, to play a cornet solo at Bobby's grave side, which he gladly did (he chose More Than You Know)....and since then Gordon has played a solo in the Chatham Cemetary every June 7th.
Simplicity itself!
earn my weight in gold
GLAAD’s official release of their statistics.
and each name a comfortable music in the mouth
There was about a five-year run where I’d have been at the Richmond International Raceway at this very moment. Now, as International Raceways are concerned, Richmond doesn’t seem like that fantastic a place. First of all, it’s tiny. The whole thing is short enough around that I could STILL run around it without having to take a break (0.8 miles-ish). It’s not particularly new like the track here in Kentucky or ones in Kansas City and Chicago. Even among the shorter NASCAR tracks, it doesn’t even have the cachet of a Bristol or Martinsville, but it’s a fantastic place to watch a race. You can see everything without working hard, the cars run close and with more speed than at a lot of tracks and even in the age of the atrocious Car of Tomorrow, cars can seem to pass each other there. In the fall, it’s also the home of the last race before the NASCAR Chase for the Championship, so it ends up hosting one of the most interesting races of the year.
More recently, he was introduced to a whole new generation of fans when he performed his signature tenor sax on Lady Gaga’s video, “The Edge of Glory.”
The Deputy Prime Minister said it was unfair that while ordinary Britons were paying 30 or 40 per cent, hundreds of millionaires were getting away with sacrificing less than 20 per cent of their income by using an ‘army of lawyers and accountants’.
How can you help parents through the emotional roller coaster associated with selecting the best child care, and be most sensitive and responsive to their feelings? Here are some of the ways you can make sure your enrollment prospects are having the emotional reaction you want them to.
“Wow, I feel like an antique right about now. Do you know how much people like me and with years and years of experience teach those with less experience? I can go to class and learn technology, if I want to, but I can’t go to class and pick up the 15 years of business experience that I have. And yes, I’m a crazy boss that dares to have an assistant that handles my paperwork because frankly I choose not to spend my time doing it. It’s not that I don’t know how, but you get to a point where you can hire folks to handle nonsense like that for you. Oh yeah, and I’ve trained dozens of people over my years in business and many of them make a boatload of money, and some more than I, and some have come back and thanked me for all I taught them.”
So grabbing some pipe wrenches and a hex T wrench I attempted to bounce my knuckles all over the floor and the wrench was hardly on the clean out cap. After reviewing the cap, I ran to get my saw all and cut the cap off the pipe, never marring the threads, still have that wonderful gift hehe. Cleaned the surface, poured some drain cleaner down the pipe, put a towel over the hole because it smelled like rotten eggs and it was brewing like some old witch making a batch of bat wing stew bubbling and gurgling which I didn't want to find a splatter of a mess on the floor or walls when I returned.
And to top it all off, I found out right before I went to bed that I won the digi prize for this round of the challenge. Wow! I haven't dabbled in the digital stamping world yet (there is something about the actual act of stamping that I love!) but I'm willing to try something new. A new technique for the new year!
Thank you, Nina, for organizing this event and giving me the opportunity to address all of you. It is always good to be among friends. It is an honor to be here in the presence of so many people who care for the preservation of freedom in our civilization.
She whipped around and glared. “What was that?”
Here is an article in the Shelby County Reporter on the event:
Ted then worked on my chakras. I could already feel a sharp sensation over my heart chakra. My mind interpreted it as pain but that wasn’t it. All my chakras ignited suddenly, blazing into action like Catherine wheels. I now feel confident, powerful, and capable to continue my amazing work. Thank you, Ted!
What can you do but try it on?
Atlantic salmon: Since 2006 some 2.5 million young Atlantic salmon have been released into creeks and rivers that empty into Lake Ontario, a collaborative effort by 50 environment-minded citizens, government and private companies. A native species — descended from saltwater fish that adapted to freshwater — Atlantic salmon were last seen in local streams in 1896.
of an ambulance
Xilinx Research Labs/NCSA, FPGA HPC – The road beyond processors, Jul 2007, here. Need more current references but I keep hearing the same themes in arguments for FGPA HPC, so let’s think about this for a bit:
If you have not had a chance to check out New Girl on Tuesday nights at 9:00 p.m., I highly recommend the show. It is slightly irreverent, but worth every minute. I know it has largely replaced NCIS Los Angeles on my regular viewing schedule.
As the campaign season heats up there will be a lot of opportunity to observe debate styles. Of course we will get to see several presidential debates, but the really telling observations will come from the lesser functionaries. Watch the methods used by the representatives of the two competing parties.
The professor then explained they were going to do this many more times, and began walking back to the deep end of the pool.
It is recommended that parents attend the information evening at their child’s home school (the school designated for their community), which can be determined using the Halton District School Board “School Locator” at http://schoollocator.hdsb.ca. Please note, Essential Level, Life Skills, Gifted, French Immersion and International Baccalaureate programs are not offered at all high schools.
& the house has no chair for Plato,
Well, likely none of us are in "The Academy" and will not be voting for the real winner. But, if you could vote, who would be your pick?
here is the invite:
12 oz (1 can) diet soda
It's pretty self explanatory, so I'll save my words for tonight. Got a bunch of other projects that are in various states of conception and completion, so I should get back to those.
Have fun selecting your fabric, and don't forget to ask any questions in the comments!
FRI. 9/26 thru SUN. 9/28 - the Catalina Island Blues Festival featuring headliners Jonny Lang and Buddy Guy. $75 - $150.
Here’s how it’s working on the ground today in Arusha, Tanzania, where Jodie Wu is based. 80% of Tanzanian farmers still beat their maize with a stick to remove the kernels from the cob. The bike-powered maize sheller can do the job 10 times faster. That means people who buy the sheller can pay for the device in a week and earn extra income, farmers can get their maize shelled far faster for less, and dealers who are selling bikes and adaptors will get more business. Even in the midst of the worst drought in 50 years, Tanzanian farmers lauded the GCS device as one of the favorite products of the year at the Nane Nane Agricultural Fair this year.
I have seen,
Serve chilled. (I prefer this dip with ritz crackers the best! :))
It took me ten minutes to make one ribbon after cutting it out: so six minutes to sew one ribbon, two more minutes to iron it and another two minutes to trim off the “beards” with my trusty little Fiskars snips. Add five minutes as guesstimate for cutting, so fifteen minutes per ribbon times thirty- two.
Peter was instrumental in getting me started into the amazing world of self development/personal growth. He’d suggest books to read, sites to check out, and opened my mind for the first time to the fact we could create our lives, that our thoughts are things and become reality. He also suggested that I get rid of the Firestone dealership. I wasn’t ready to hear that then.
One of the newest point and shoot cameras in their Powershot line on the market is the Canon SD90IS. Great for the serious amateur and professionals looking for something a bit smaller than their DSLR, it has great features for a variety of situations.
Joe: There must be an unwritten rule that states the size of the dog should be inversely proportionate to the size of the RV. Next time you are in a campground, see if the St. Bernard doesn't belong to the owner of the van camper. And notice the size of the dog sitting in the pocket of the person that just got out of the 40-foot fifth-wheeler. Go figure!
Jessica, Skylar and Hollie performed ‘Higher and Higher’ by Jackie Wilson as a trio. Randy said the girls’ performance sounded amazing, while J.Lo said it’s a real treat to have them singing together. And if one of them wins, it’ll be the first female winner in five seasons. The last was — drumroll, please — was Jordin Sparks during Season 6.
You know who else is real good folks? Elisabeth Bumiller and Thom Shanker, the New York Times reporters who wrote this story. In a 17-paragraph story, they buried the fact that Howard was the single biggest recipient last election of defense contractor largesse in the 12th 'graph. The Times has editorialized against the influence of unrestricted corporate donations. Is it too much too ask their reporters that they elevate the single most relevant fact in the story to place where people might actually read it?
~Epictetus
- A child gets security and identity.
Rather than search for viable middle ground, both parties have agitated and administered hyperemotional brands of populism, intent upon characterizing one another as the agents of extreme new visions of America. The democrats view themselves as saving middle-class Americans from the crass inequalities and short sightedness of capitalism, while the Republicans believe they are rescuing the same middle-class Americans from financial ruin at the hands of a bloated and inefficient government. Writing about the political battles of the 1790s, renowned biographer Ron Chernow issued this assessment, “Each side possessed a distorted vision of the other, buttressed by an idealized, and equally distorted, sense of itself.” How strikingly similar to the political circus of the 2010s.
*Since I’m about the only bloke doing regular Beer Dinners I figured I’d get away with such a bold claim! It sounded better in the promo than “not the worst bloke you could get to do a Beer Dinner...” or “almost as good as pulling some dodgy random off the street...”
Nicolas left La Stella that day knowing two things. One, a part of him was abandoned inside, clinging to the freshness of her, which led to number two.
It turns out, this Coleman camping table was on clearance (to my husband's delight) from $50 down to $11. It was 32" x 48", fold-able and light weight for easy storage, and had an adjustable height to 27" high. I'm short, so it just might work. So my prince-to-the-rescue ran off to Home Depot in the snow to get my cutting table.
Color: Black/White
In 1986, my best friend gave birth to my Goddaughter naming her Jessica and I used her name. I also was singing the song “Put the Blame on Mame“ made famous by Rita Hayworth’s famous character Gilda and she became part of the inspiration for her look. This would later inspire the mini-short film ”Smooth Criminal” for Michael Jackson’s This Is It.
I decided to pair the chicken and potatoes with asparagus, since they’re in season, and I LOVE them. I just steamed them in my Ziploc Zip n’ Steam bags for 4 minutes (I like them al dente) and then tossed 1 tsp of olive oil, a bit of garlic powder, salt, and pepper.
For instance, we had noticed in Granot’s papercuts that certain Hebrew letters were frequently elongated or otherwise distorted. It soon became evident that this was not an arbitrary artistic choice, but a practice rooted in centuries of handwritten Torah scrolls, allowing scribes to create perfectly justified columns of text.
"I prayed for you."
The Tales series has always had interesting cast of characters and story that kept me coming back to play the series. I can’t even count the number of games that I’ve played from this series, and that just goes to show how appealing this series is. And that brings me to the latest English translated Tales game that’s coming out soon for the PS3, Tales of Graces F.
I appreciate being with people who “get it.” I know talking parenting is different with other parents of special needs kids. I know talking about medicine or life and death issues is different with other cancer survivors. I know that being with other women is different than being in a mixed group. Even being with a group of women “of a certain age” is different than being in a multigenerational group. Talking spirituality with other Pagans is different than talking spirituality with Christians or Jews or Muslims. Shared experience does count.
When we come apart for breath, even the meagre distance between us seems unbearable.
Manchester City win the FA Cup Final leaving Stoke Runners Up. Winning the FA Cup guarantees an Europa League place but, if City achieve a league position of fourth or higher then their Europa League place will go to the FA Cup Runners Up - Stoke. City should have played Stoke in a league game on the same day as the final. The rearranged fixture will be played the week after the Cup and if Stoke lose, City could bag 4th spot thus allowing Tony Pulis's boys
So, I used Mat Hayward's randomiser (came up first in my google search), and input numbers for everyone who commented last week. After just a single click, a winner had been chosen...
in corn syrup and milk. Shape dough into a 12-inch
to overcome my utter weakness,
Thanking Him that I can get on my knees and come to here right here from the quietness of my room.
The task of identifying and cataloging the pastoral practices of the sixty-odd dioceses in the eleven jurisdictions of the Assembly of Bishops is gargantuan. We are grateful to the members of the Committee, Bishops Theodosy and Mark, and to the consultants for their efforts. We are especially thankful for the goodwill and co-operation shown by the many jurisdictional hierarchs and administrators in providing the relevant data to the Committee as we work and pray for the future unity of all Orthodox Christians in America, in faith and in practice.
I can’t be the only one to confess that my blood pressure raises and eyes dilate when I hear the all too familiar “Ding!” of my phone when a new email comes in. I’m like one of Ivan Pavlov’s dogs, except instead of salivating, I’m overcome with the urge to immediately check my phone and respond instantly with an answer to or acknowledgement of the pending request. This mindset can make for a stressful week, but apply it to the 2-days we’re supposed to allow ourselves for rest and relaxation each weekend and this flirts on the brink of insanity.
The Dr. came in a few minutes and they got ready. The epidural was really strong, and I couldn't even feel when to push (not like the first time where I felt the need to push very badly). But they told me to push, and in that one push the head was out. She had me stop to get the shoulders out, and at 5:12AM we had the baby!
As far as Sri Lanka is concerned, our policy in respect of all matters will continue to be guided by the vital interests and wellbeing of the people of our country. It hardly requires emphasis that this cannot yield place to any other consideration.’
Byron and I finished our café noirs and hit I-10 east. Traffic was very light and we made it to Kiln with time to spare even after making two pit stops to relieve ourselves of all that strong black coffee. We met with Leslie Henderson at her brewery. We took an interesting tour and then spent the morning talking with her and Matt McKiernan about our lives in the South, Southern food, hospitality and the state of Southern beers. We suggested food and beer parings to each other – my brother and I were impressed with their passion for crafting great beers. Lazy Magnolia beers have an affinity for the foods of the Gulf coast.
All hail the Branaugh.
Write what you can make into a developed, fulfilling story.
After some denials and question-answers finally he agreed for Dare.
748 ***D-V/11/1977. “Kierkegaard, Abraham and Socrates: Illusions of the Absurd.” Rockford College, Rockford, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1991(4), above, pp. 854-73, 1048-52, and in Item B-15 (Projected), above, pp.111-34 (2004).)
I’m extremely grateful for the 1st time to receive The Versatile Blogger Award . Thank you to Arab Writer Chick who has a great blog about news events, book and movie reviews, poetry, short fiction, essays, tips on writing and a whole lot more. I value receiving the award, thank you Arab Writer Chick.
‘He could have been 15 but he could have been 23. He could have been a paedophile or a rapist.
She had stepped onto the bottom of the climbing staircase, a slim silhouette in a pink two-piece suit, a luminous face in the halo of blonde locks. Ben thought of swans, of roses, and rains of apple blossoms. He had never seen anything that beautiful, that elegant.
I have seen some lovely flowers on people's cards and thought I'd show you how I did those on my latest card. I hope you find it interesting.
1 bag of Nacho Cheese (Or similar) Doritos
50. Education of Harriet Hatfield, The: May Sarton
Will we see you there?
No, no, Monstee, you may as well stay there and wait a bit longer
Topics:
Maher, host of HBO's "Real Time," had levied his attacks on Santorum and his wife Karen for homeschooling their six school-age children.
I lean out further and tug again.
This is shaping up to be one of the most diverse of Grab Bags yet with another very different sort of band appearing. Although I only recently posted their full-lungth album, 10,000 Tropics, Dive Signal has released an EP. While firmly ambient like the album, this has got some jazzy aspects. The first track has got some sweet as bass line running through it and later swore I heard free jazz horns! Quite astounding how when your game is subtly that the smallest introduction of new elements can be fantastic.
21 years
Hello and Welcome.
32. Santa Claus Has Got The Aids This Year - 1980
My training has been on the use and experience with two primary economic impact models, those being IMplan and REMI. There is also the US Commerce RIMSII. I have found REMI to be the most conservative and thus I have stayed proficient with their models and generally try to stay close to their economic multipliers for economic impact valuation.
Part four
Pious cant, no doubt. But pious cant that was spoonfed to young children, as something that applied to all members of the church.
He had to admit that the kids were normal-"bright and confident for the most part," my friend laughs.
2. Denver Broncos
Chocolate tour by Paris Walks
Port Brewing Company / Pizza Port Shark Bite Red Ale
A UK hardback first edition of Richard Price's Samaritan, published by Bloomsbury in 2003. Price, for those who don't know, is a writer's writer, i.e. the kind of writer other writers admire and aspire to be as good as, or at least approach. David Simon made use of his talents on a number of episodes of The Wire, while the likes of George Pelecanos and Dennis Lehane (both also, not entirely coincidentally, former Wire writers: Pelecanos actually got Price involved in the show) owe him a debt. Price's novels are few and far between, just eight stretching across a thirty-five-plus year career, mostly dwelling on the underbelly of urban America, the best known of which probably those that were turned into films – Clockers (1992) and Freedomland (1998). In August this year Price signed a deal with Henry Holt to write a series of straight-up detective novels under a pen name, Jay Morris. I read an article at the time to the effect that Price got so sick of slaving and sweating over worthy and difficult-to-write (but not to read) books that he figured he might as well try something a bit easier instead (and maybe make some crazy bank in the process). And why the hell not.
Here's a con that so far, I've never seen in any official debate or press release relating to the issue. Consider the road between Dunfermline and Kirkcaldy. For those of you who don't know it, it's a twelve mile near motorway standard road with grade separated junctions. However, it's not a motorway, it's the A92. A good quality A road that doesn't piss about (until it reaches the failed schemes at Glenrothes which define pissing about).
For example, The West today is very rich. It's also dying out due to low birthrates.
Contact: Helene, 06 36 20 36 86, feltgoood(at)hotmail.com
Small cubes take less time to freeze, break down easier in a blender when
for u all the fair maidens foul,
RIP little Cupcake. We loved you, you were a wonderful pet and we will miss you lots.
12) VAMPIRE – The Crystals
But it's not fixed, the tenant below has water seeping out of his wall. And the tenant below him had a window-ledge full of wet, too.
"Happy Valentine's Day," she said and finally looked up at him.
Cuisine: Chinese
After a brief rest, I went for it. When it was done, Jack and I both agreed that it was one of the better reps of the day. The chest and elbows were better than any other lift and there was good drive out of the bottom. It was very satisfying. It was noisy too. I turned a few heads groaning loudly as I completed the lift. Just the way it goes.
“Okay. So what happened to it?” I asked. After all she was working well and I wasn’t able to concentrate on anything, anyhow.
Chairman, and Director of the Jesuits’ Federal Reserve Bank of New
They are often adorned in a variety of ways including with sequins, studs, a pendant or a cameo.
There are other frailties in the team which Dalglish must address urgently, if Liverpool is to mount a challenge for a Champions League position next season. Lucas Leiva should return from a lengthy break due to injury and his comeback won’t be too soon for Liverpool fans.
- Quinoa
10. Met some Philippinos tourist during island hopping tour. They are friendly crowds and also a very well-mannered family, very educated. I like them all and it made me think that Philippinos are warm and friendly. However, some people are not as friendly.
When I resigned, I did so with the Conservatives on average nine points in the lead and with a respectable working majority to look forward to. GDP from the last quarter of 2009 had been announced at +0.1%, which sounded like that Classic Brownism "a 0% increase", whilst America had bounced back at a fecund +5.7%. The 'news' that Brown was a foul-mouthed bastard who shouted and pushed and threw things was due to dominate the weekend papers. All in all, it seemed unlikely that Labour would start pegging back the Tory lead. Cameron, even if by default, would win. I was not a rat leaving a sinking ship, I felt. More like a rat on a floating ship who discovered that the other rats had started to pong a bit, and was happy to take his chance elsewhere. To git while the gitting was good, as an American cowboy would have it.
Moyer-Sims, of Portland, Ore., said the group has grown much more organized. “We have a protocol for most things,” she said, including getting legal help for people who are arrested.
Why do girls love bad boy?
Director (MICHAEL JACKSON'S THRILLER, AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN LONDON) JOHN LANDIS says FLESH AND BLOOD is "TERRIFIC!"
So David went without eating to show his sorrow, and he begged God to make the boy well. David would not sleep on his bed, but spent each night lying on the floor. His officials stood beside him and tried to talk him into getting up. But he would not get up or eat with them.
Oh well, another paper laid to rest, but no rest for me just yet, I have to write up a story list for my reporter.
charismatic blang!
The other scenario is this:
This time last year, Miss Baby K decided she'd make her appearance, one day before her due date. I remember my sister texting me to tell me she thought she was having contractions and whilst we were at the carnival, she text me to tell me she was going into hospital. That was about 3pm and then we heard nothing until I got a picture message of a brand new bundle of baby from my Sister at around 10:30pm.
I Peter 3:21 baptism now saves you
Of Chambers as the Cedars –
But since we're making caramel popcorn here, I just pour the popped popcorn into the largest mixing bowl I have (and add your toasted nuts if using), and then set it aside. Then comes the making of the caramel. In a small pot, combine butter, brown sugar, and a little bit of corn syrup (to make the popcorn shiny), and melt it all down. Once it reaches 255 F with a candy thermometer, take it off heat and add in some salt, vanilla extract, and baking soda. Then stir it up, and immediately pour it over your popcorn. Toss your popcorn with the caramel (I use two spatulas for this) until evenly coated, and pour out onto two silpat-lined baking sheets.
The Road (better than Denzel’s version but not as good as the novel)
What your loved one needs is your presence. Sometimes that’s easier to give when you’re not doing the heavy caregiving yourself.
Even as Abraham believed God, and it was accounted to him for righteousness. Know ye therefore that they which are of faith, the same are the children of Abraham. (Gal 3:6-7)
Zelda tends to open her teeny little eyes when she wakes up from the seizure...
I remember reading a review for The Christmas Attic in which the author wrote that there is nothing new on the release, nothing different from Christmas Eve & Other Stories. I wonder how much of the music the writer actually listened to? Yes, the music is along the lines of Christmas Eve & Other Stories, but songs like The Music Box, Dream Child, An Angel’s Share, Christmas Canon, Music Box Blues, The Three Kings And I… There was no songs like them on the first release.
“Two were tall, about six-two, six-three. About forty years old. The third was about five-ten, maybe thirty-five years old. The two older ones were a little pudgy, and the younger one was thin. I know for sure the smaller one had a gun, not sure about the other two.”
Gum chewers. I’m pretty sure I’ve already mentioned this in a post. Here. But the smacking sound makes me want to jab my pencil through your temple if it will make you stop. I can’t focus when I hear this sound. I hate all sounds of chewing/lip smacking. Even crunchy foods annoy me, though I’ve taken that down a notch over the years because I know that’s kind of irrational. Crunchy foods simply aren’t quiet.
There are countless examples throughout scriptures, where men and women of faith faced horribly fearful things, yet made the choice to trust God.
be this pencil holder with color pencils inside.
During the case, an SAS witness identified only as ‘Soldier D’ admitted opening fire on Mr Grew while he was on the ground.
Sudama is already very Old, during his times IT Firms were smaller in every aspect. He joined at a junior level during his early career. From their he got into the core of Server Monitoring and Log Analysis. He says that today things are complex.
We’ve also got some rare Irish etchings by Royal academy Artist Barbara Rae CBE
Harvesting tips:
and Bobby Lee went up with our notice of eviction--
I can give you a good idea of how horrendous mate, I swore. I said "Why don't you get off my frigging case, you crazy whore-faced miscreant!!". She was speechless for at least a minute. You know very well how little I swear. I guess it's because of the time I spent at the School of Christian Brothers. Those were tough times at that school, Dominic and Lorenzo Christiano were harsh taskmasters, but I was always taught that swearing was wrong and that every time I swore, Jesus would drop some change and bump his head looking for it. Of course, it later transpired that the Christian Brothers establishment was not a school at all but a mechanics. As a result I cannot quote you any poetry, or solve an equation, but I can strip the engine of a ford fiesta in 10 minutes flat.
There were people on the beach that morning and I wondered if they were as awe struck as I was by the beauty that Mother Nature was providing us. I didn't hear any ooh-ing or aaw-ing as I passed, nor did I see any other cameras.
Another option are juice bars. Pack in those micronutrients with your fresh pressed fruit or veggie juices.
“Hello, I hope you don’t mind us calling in on you like this, but I wonder if you could tell us what this place is… We were driving along here and we don’t quite understand it, but we were compelled to come up your drive.”
There’s no pretence here. His posture is slumped as if he doesn’t care what people think of him, and the hunted expression speaks clearly of a man who didn’t want to be ‘taken’ at all. But there’s humour in that face, and I’m almost certain he’s looking at someone out of shot who’s trying to make him laugh. Just on this picture I decided he was his own man, and with a hint of devilry beside.
1) If you don’t want people to know something, DON’T TELL ANYONE! I mean, seriously?, it’s about time you know that the tactic of “fine, I’ll tell you, but you can’t tell anyone,” REALLY doesn’t work. There are very, very few trustworthy people, but the truth is, even if you THINK you know who’s trustworthy and who is not… you’re trusting a HUMAN and humans make mistakes. If you don’t want to take the risk that your friend slips up, talks in anger, or betrays your trust, keep it to yourself.
Five plus one is SIX. Seven Minus one is also SIX. Not four, or five, but SIX. SIX is the number.
Recently, Saudi public elementary schools have allowed first through third grade boys to have female teachers. One of the last orders made by Prince Salman bin Abdul Aziz as he was leaving his post as Riyadh governor to become Minister of Defense was that these schools must ensure the 6- through 8-year-old boys not be able to talk or play with their female peers in school corridors or during recess.
Last night I received a text message from Sabrina saying, "I have something for you. It might be amazing."
*sniffle*
On Sunday morning Rick and I took the opportunity to attend church at the Vineyard, the place where we met, fell in love, were adopted into a wonderful “small group” of believers, and were supported through the deaths of our first two children. We met up with two other incredible friends, Jerry and Shelley Bowen, who were our lifeblood during some of our most difficult days. Again, it was as if time stood still and we were back thirty years ago, young 20 somethings, meeting with good friends over Mexican food.
We’re together now, regardless, and I can always say
She is also unbelievably cynical and because the emotional roller coaster of keeping up with “the world” and it’s happenings are exhausting she tends to avoid taking up Iona’s offer to pick up pecan nuts, or to build a hide out.
16So then because thou art lukewarm, and neither cold nor hot, I will spue thee out of my mouth.
- The more exciting combat and action makes Oracle of Seasons extra thrilling compared to Oracle of Ages.
At service this morning, Pastor Nick discussed carrying our crosses. It was a very strong message. As a Christian we need to cast aside any parts of our lives, whether they be people, material objects, desires, etc. that lead us away from our Christianity. We need to carry our cross, and carry it proudly. We can’t hide our necklaces under our shirts, or be afraid to say “God Bless You”.
Congratulations to these two deserving students.
So in all three jurisdictions, Dad collects $3.5 million, right? Well, not so fast. In Virginia and in D.C., you would be correct that Dad is entitled to his full recovery. That is because neither D.C., nor Virginia, have legislatively limited damages in (non-medical malpractice) personal-injury cases. Maryland, however, has enacted a legislative limit on the pain and suffering component of damages. Thus, the $1 million the jury awarded will be legislatively limited to $770,000.00 once the jury leaves the courtroom. If you want to read the law, look at Md. Courts & Jud. Proc. §11-308.
Amy Winehouse - Oxegen Festival Ireland, 12 July 2008
In the end, I finished in 33:50 for an average 8:28 pace and 17/44 in my age group. Not the 8:09 or 8:15 pace I originally hoped for, but I hit my revised goals almost perfectly and got a PR of almost a minute. Which means I'm happy with this race. Nothing like triumphing over adversity. And I think it also says a lot about having realistic goals. And having a great support group.
U.S. Civilian Industry 0.1
Overall, this was a very well organized event. The route was scenic and decently challenging with hills. The profits went to charity which is always a definite plus. And, for the runners they had Panera Cinnamon Crunch as well as Asiago Cheese bagels. Can you say delicious? They also had oranges and bananas, but lets be honest this was only a 5k and while I pushed myself, I would much rather have a bagel after! I’m looking forward to participating again next year assuming my schedule allows it. The only downside is that it is not a certified course and to be honest, both a mapping software and my GPS watch had it a tiny bit long. But whatever, it was a great race!
I am not one of these people who walks around with a bucket-load of faith in my hand at all times. Truthfully, I'm a minnow in the big blogging pond. I am not eloquent, not educated, I don't have much when it comes to ability...I'm a little stay-at-home mama of ten who just loves the Lord with all my heart, and loves these kids. But I am telling you- GOD is getting involved here!!!
But there was no one like Ahab who sold himself to do wickedness in the sight of the Lord, because Jezebel his wife stirred him up.
According to an analysis by Leonard Zeskind, who researches and advocates against what he calls far-right, racist or anti-Semitic groups, the number of Minutemen organizations dropped by more than half from 2010 to 2011. Only 53 Minutemen groups showed signs of activity last year—down from a high of 115 in 2010—and none of them are currently patrolling the border. Zeskind blames the tea party for absorbing a good chunk of the movement. The widely publicized murders perpetrated by a former Minutemen leader against a Hispanic child and her father also contributed to the groups’ decline. Heidi Bierich, director of the Southern Poverty Law Center’s Intelligence Project, says that the only organized volunteers patrolling the border right now are the ones originally not welcome: neo-Nazis.
Dads across the country were not amused. They had good reason not to be. It turns our that 32% of fathers are their children's primary caregivers. And most of the other 68% pitch in with child care -- at least to the extent of knowing how and when to, uh, change a diaper.
What troubles and difficulties have I caused to __________________?
Cats with 3 legs
